California, session 20252026, AB2764.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 366.31 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:366.31. (a) If a review hearing is the last review hearing to be held before the child attains 18 years of age, the court shall ensure all of the following:(1) The child’s case plan includes a plan for the child to satisfy one or more of the participation conditions described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403, so that the child is eligible to remain in foster care as a nonminor dependent.(2) The child has been informed of their right to seek termination of dependency jurisdiction pursuant to Section 391, and understands the potential benefits of continued dependency.(3) The child is informed of their right to have dependency reinstated pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388, and understands the potential benefits of continued dependency.(b) At the review hearing that occurs in the six-month period before the child attains 18 years of age, and at every subsequent review hearing for the nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, the report shall describe all of the following:(1) The child’s and nonminor dependent’s plans to remain in foster care and plans to meet one or more of the participation conditions as described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403 to continue to receive AFDC-FC benefits as a nonminor dependent.(2) The efforts made and assistance provided to the child and nonminor dependent by the social worker or the probation officer so that the child and nonminor dependent will be able to meet the participation conditions.(3) Efforts toward completing the items described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 391.(4) On and after October 1, 2021, for a child or nonminor dependent whose placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program has been reviewed and approved, and, on and after July 1, 2022, for a child or nonminor dependent whose placement in a community treatment facility has been reviewed and approved, pursuant to Section 361.22, the report prepared for the review shall include evidence of all of the following:(A) Ongoing assessment of the strengths and needs of the child or nonminor dependent continues to support the determination that the needs of the child or nonminor dependent cannot be met by family members or in another family-based setting, placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program or community treatment facility, as applicable, continues to provide the most effective and appropriate care setting in the least restrictive environment, and placement is consistent with the short- and long-term mental and behavioral health goals and permanency plan for the child or nonminor dependent.(B) Documentation of the child or nonminor dependent’s specific treatment or service needs that will be met in the placement and the length of time the child or nonminor dependent is expected to need the treatment or services. For a Medi-Cal beneficiary, the determination of services and expected length of time for those services funded by Medi-Cal shall be based upon medical necessity and on all other state and federal Medi-Cal requirements, and shall be reflected in the documentation.(C) Documentation of the intensive and ongoing efforts made by the child welfare department, consistent with the child or nonminor dependent’s permanency plan, to prepare the child or nonminor dependent to return home or to be placed with a fit and willing relative, a legal guardian, an adoptive parent, in a resource family home, a tribally approved home, or in another appropriate family-based setting, or, in the case of a nonminor dependent, in a supervised independent living setting.(5) (A) For a child or nonminor dependent in high school who has been under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for a year or longer, the information in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 366.1.(B) (i) Whether the social worker or probation officer has informed the minor or nonminor dependent of the information in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 366.1.(ii) This paragraph does not affect any applicable confidentiality law.(6) Whether the social worker or probation officer has, pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (22) of subdivision (g) of Section 16501.1, identified the person or persons who shall be responsible for assisting the child or nonminor dependent with applications for postsecondary education and related financial aid, or that the child or nonminor dependent stated that they do not want to pursue postsecondary education, including career or technical education.(c) The reviews conducted pursuant to this section for a nonminor dependent shall be conducted in a manner that respects the nonminor’s status as a legal adult, focused on the goals and services described in the youth’s transitional independent living case plan, as described in subdivision (y) of Section 11400, including whether the nonminor dependent requests the transfer of jurisdiction to a new county, efforts made to maintain connections with caring and permanently committed adults, and attended, as appropriate, by additional participants invited by the nonminor dependent.(d) For a nonminor dependent whose case plan is continued court-ordered family reunification services pursuant to Section 361.6, the court shall consider whether the nonminor dependent may safely reside in the home of the parent or guardian. If the nonminor cannot reside safely in the home of the parent or guardian or if it is not in the nonminor dependent’s best interest to reside in the home of the parent or guardian, the court must consider whether to continue or terminate reunification services for the parent or legal guardian and whether the nonminor dependent requests the transfer of jurisdiction to a new county.(1) The review report shall include a discussion of all of the following:(A) Whether foster care placement continues to be necessary and appropriate.(B) The likely date by which the nonminor dependent may reside safely in the home of the parent or guardian or will achieve independence.(C) Whether the parent or guardian and nonminor dependent were actively involved in the development of the case plan.(D) Whether the social worker or probation officer has provided reasonable services designed to aid the parent or guardian to overcome the problems that led to the initial removal of the nonminor dependent.(E) The extent of progress the parents or guardian have made toward alleviating or mitigating the causes necessitating placement in foster care.(F) Whether the nonminor dependent and parent, parents, or guardian are in agreement with the continuation of reunification services.(G) Whether continued reunification services are in the best interest of the nonminor dependent.(H) Whether there is a substantial probability that the nonminor dependent will be able to safely reside in the home of the parent or guardian by the next review hearing date.(I) The efforts to maintain the nonminor’s connections with caring and permanently committed adults.(J) The agency’s compliance with the nonminor dependent’s transitional independent living case plan, including efforts to finalize the nonminor’s permanent plan and prepare the nonminor dependent for independence.(K) The progress in providing the information and documents to the nonminor dependent as described in Section 391.(L) (i) For a nonminor dependent in high school who has been under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for a year or longer, the information in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 366.1.(ii) Whether the social worker or probation officer has informed the nonminor dependent of the information in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 366.1.(iii) This subparagraph does not affect any applicable confidentiality law.(M) Whether the social worker or probation officer has, pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (22) of subdivision (g) of Section 16501.1, identified the person or persons who shall be responsible for assisting the child or nonminor dependent with applications for postsecondary education and related financial aid, or that the child or nonminor dependent stated that they do not want to pursue postsecondary education including career or technical education.(2) The court shall inquire about the progress being made to provide a permanent home for the nonminor, shall consider the safety of the nonminor dependent, and shall determine all of the following:(A) The continuing necessity for, and appropriateness of, the placement. If the child or nonminor dependent is placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program on or after October 1, 2021, or is placed in a community treatment facility on or after July 1, 2022, the court shall consider the evidence and documentation submitted pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) in making this determination.(B) Whether the agency has made reasonable efforts to maintain relationships between the nonminor dependent and individuals who are important to the nonminor dependent.(C) The extent of the agency’s compliance with the case plan in making reasonable efforts or, in the case of an Indian child, active efforts, as described in Section 361.7, to create a safe home of the parent or guardian for the nonminor to reside in or to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the nonminor dependent.(D) The extent of the agency’s compliance with the nonminor dependent’s transitional independent living case plan, including efforts to finalize the youth’s permanent plan and prepare the nonminor dependent for independence.(E) The adequacy of services provided to the parent or guardian and to the nonminor dependent. The court shall consider the progress in providing the information and documents to the nonminor dependent as described in Section 391. The court shall also consider the need for, and progress in providing, the assistance and services described in Section 391.(F) The extent of progress the parents or legal guardians have made toward alleviating or mitigating the causes necessitating placement in foster care.(G) The likely date by which the nonminor dependent may safely reside in the home of the parent or guardian or, if the court is terminating reunification services, the likely date by which it is anticipated the nonminor dependent will achieve independence, or, for an Indian child, in consultation with the child’s tribe, placed for tribal customary adoption.(H) Whether the agency has made reasonable efforts as required in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 366 to establish or maintain the nonminor dependent’s relationship with their siblings who are under the juvenile court’s jurisdiction.(I) The services needed to assist the nonminor dependent to make the transition from foster care to successful adulthood.(J) Whether or not reasonable efforts to make and finalize a permanent placement for the nonminor dependent have been made.(K) (i) If the nonminor dependent is in high school and has been under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for a year or longer, whether the social worker or probation officer has taken the actions described in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 366.(ii) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this subparagraph.(L) (i) Whether the social worker or probation officer has, pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (22) of subdivision (g) of Section 16501.1, identified the person or persons who shall be responsible for assisting the child or nonminor dependent with applications for postsecondary education and related financial aid, or that the child or nonminor dependent stated that they do not want to pursue postsecondary education, including career or technical education.(ii) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this subparagraph.(3) If the court determines that a nonminor dependent may safely reside in the home of the parent or former guardian, the court may order the nonminor dependent to return to the family home. After the nonminor dependent returns to the family home, the court may terminate jurisdiction and proceed under applicable provisions of Section 391 or continue jurisdiction as a nonminor under subdivision (a) of Section 303 and hold hearings as follows:(A) At every hearing for a nonminor dependent residing in the home of the parent or guardian, the court shall set a hearing within six months of the previous hearing. The court shall advise the parties of their right to be present. At least 10 calendar days before the hearing, the social worker or probation officer shall file a report with the court describing the services offered to the family and the progress made by the family in eliminating the conditions or factors requiring court supervision. The report shall address all of the following:(i) Whether the parent or guardian and the nonminor dependent were actively involved in the development of the case plan.(ii) Whether the social worker or probation officer has provided reasonable services to eliminate the need for court supervision.(iii) The progress of providing information and documents to the nonminor dependent as described in Section 391.(B) The court shall inquire about progress being made, shall consider the safety of the nonminor dependent, and shall determine all of the following:(i) The continuing need for court supervision.(ii) The extent of the agency’s compliance with the case plan in making reasonable efforts to maintain a safe family home for the nonminor dependent.(C) If the court finds that court supervision is no longer necessary, the court shall terminate jurisdiction under applicable provisions of Section 391.(e) For a nonminor dependent who is no longer receiving court-ordered family reunification services and is in a permanent plan of another planned permanent living arrangement, at the review hearing held every six months pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 366.3, the reviewing body shall inquire about the progress being made to provide permanent connections with caring, committed adults for the nonminor dependent, shall consider the safety of the nonminor, shall consider the transitional independent living case plan, and whether the nonminor dependent requests the transfer of jurisdiction to a new county, and shall determine all of the following:(1) The continuing necessity for, and appropriateness of, the placement.(2) The continuing appropriateness and extent of compliance with the permanent plan for the nonminor dependent, including efforts to identify and maintain relationships with individuals who are important to the nonminor dependent.(3) The extent of the agency’s compliance with the nonminor dependent’s transitional independent living case plan, including whether or not reasonable efforts have been made to make and finalize the youth’s permanent plan and prepare the nonminor dependent for independence.(4) Whether a prospective adoptive parent has been identified and assessed as appropriate for the nonminor dependent’s adoption under this section, whether the prospective adoptive parent has been informed about the terms of the written negotiated adoption assistance agreement pursuant to Section 16120, and whether adoption should be ordered as the nonminor dependent’s permanent plan. If nonminor dependent adoption is ordered as the nonminor dependent’s permanent plan, a hearing pursuant to subdivision (f) shall be held within 60 days. When the court orders a hearing pursuant to subdivision (f), it shall direct the agency to prepare a report that shall include the provisions of paragraph (5) of subdivision (f).(5) For the nonminor dependent who is an Indian child, whether, in consultation with the nonminor’s tribe, the nonminor should be placed for tribal customary adoption.(6) The adequacy of services provided to the nonminor dependent. The court shall consider the progress in providing the information and documents to the nonminor dependent as described in Section 391. The court shall also consider the need for, and progress in providing, the assistance and services described in Section 391.(7) The likely date by which it is anticipated the nonminor dependent will achieve adoption or independence.(8) Whether the agency has made reasonable efforts as required in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 366 to establish or maintain the nonminor dependent’s relationship with their siblings who are under the juvenile court’s jurisdiction.(9) The services needed to assist the nonminor dependent to make the transition from foster care to successful adulthood.(10) When the hearing described in this subdivision is held pursuant to paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 366.3, and the nonminor dependent has a permanent plan of another planned permanent living arrangement, the court shall do all of the following:(A) Ask the nonminor dependent about their desired permanency outcome.(B) Make a judicial determination explaining why, as of the hearing date, another planned permanent living arrangement is the best permanency plan for the nonminor dependent.(C) State for the record the compelling reason or reasons why it continues not to be in the best interest of the nonminor dependent to return home, be placed for adoption, be placed for tribal customary adoption in the case of an Indian child, be placed with a legal guardian, or be placed with a fit and willing relative.(11) (A) If the nonminor dependent is in high school and has been under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for a year or longer, whether the social worker or probation officer has taken the actions described in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 366.(B) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this paragraph.(12) (A) Whether the social worker or probation officer has, pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (22) of subdivision (g) of Section 16501.1, identified the person or persons who shall be responsible for assisting the child or nonminor dependent with applications for postsecondary education and related financial aid, or that the child or nonminor dependent stated that they do not want to pursue postsecondary education, including career or technical education.(B) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this subparagraph.(f) (1) At a hearing to consider a permanent plan of adoption for a nonminor dependent, the court shall read and consider the report in paragraph (5) and receive other evidence that the parties may present. A copy of the executed negotiated agreement shall be attached to the report. If the court finds pursuant to this section that nonminor dependent adoption is the appropriate permanent plan, it shall make findings and orders to do the following:(A) Approve the adoption agreement and declare the nonminor dependent is the adopted child of the adoptive parent, and that the nonminor dependent and adoptive parents agree to assume toward each other the legal relationship of parents and child and to have all of the rights and be subject to all of the duties and responsibilities of that relationship.(B) Declare that the birth parents of the nonminor dependent are, from the time of the adoption, relieved of all parental duties toward, and responsibility for, the adopted nonminor dependent and have no rights over the adopted nonminor dependent.(2) If the court finds that the nonminor dependent and the prospective adoptive parent have mutually consented to the adoption, the court may enter the adoption order after it determines all of the following:(A) Whether the notice was given as required by law.(B) Whether the nonminor dependent and prospective adoptive parent are present for the hearing.(C) Whether the court has read and considered the assessment prepared by the social worker or probation officer.(D) Whether the court considered the wishes of the nonminor dependent.(E) If the nonminor dependent is eligible, the prospective adoptive parent has signed the negotiated adoption assistance agreement pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 16120, and whether a copy of the executed negotiated agreement is attached to the report.(F) Whether the adoption is in the best interest of the nonminor dependent.(3) If the court orders the establishment of the nonminor dependent adoption, it shall dismiss dependency or transitional jurisdiction.(4) If the court does not order the establishment of the nonminor dependent adoption, the nonminor dependent shall remain in a planned permanent living arrangement subject to periodic review of the juvenile court pursuant to this section.(5) At least 10 calendar days before the hearing, the social worker or probation officer shall file a report with the court and provide a copy of the report to all parties. The report shall describe the following:(A) Whether or not the nonminor dependent has any developmental disability and whether the proposed adoptive parent is suitable to meet the needs of the nonminor dependent.(B) The length and nature of the relationship between the prospective adoptive parent and the nonminor dependent, including whether the prospective adoptive parent has been determined to have been established as the nonminor’s permanent connection.(C) Whether the nonminor dependent has been determined to be eligible for the adoption assistance program and, if so, whether the prospective adoptive parent has signed the negotiated adoption assistance agreement pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 16120.(D) Whether a copy of the executed negotiated agreement is attached to the report.(E) Whether criminal background clearances were completed for the prospective adoptive parent as required by Section 671(a)(20)(A) and (a)(20)(C) of Title 42 of the United States Code.(F) Whether the prospective adoptive parent who is married and not legally separated from that spouse has the consent of the spouse, provided that the spouse is capable of giving that consent.(G) Whether the adoption of the nonminor dependent is in the best interests of the nonminor dependent and the prospective adoptive parent.(H) Whether the nonminor dependent and the prospective adoptive parent have mutually consented to the adoption.(6) The social worker or probation officer shall serve written notice of the hearing in the manner and to the persons set forth in Section 295, including the prospective adoptive parent or parents, except that notice to the nonminor’s birth parents is not required.(7) Nothing in this section shall prevent a nonminor dependent from filing an adoption petition pursuant to Section 9300 of the Family Code.(g) Each licensed foster family agency shall submit reports for each nonminor dependent in its care to the court concerning the continuing appropriateness and extent of compliance with the nonminor dependent’s permanent plan, the extent of compliance with the transitional independent living case plan, and the type and adequacy of services provided to the nonminor dependent. The report shall document that the nonminor has received all the information and documentation described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 391. If the court is considering terminating dependency jurisdiction for a nonminor dependent it shall first hold a hearing pursuant to Section 391.(h) When the nonminor dependent is in another planned permanent living arrangement, the social study prepared for the hearing held under subdivision (e) shall include a description of all of the following:(1) The intensive and ongoing efforts to return the nonminor dependent to the home of the parent, place the nonminor dependent for adoption, or place the nonminor dependent with a fit and willing relative, as appropriate.(2) The steps taken to do both of the following:(A) Ensure that the nonminor dependent’s care provider is following the reasonable and prudent parent standard.(B) Determine whether the nonminor dependent has regular, ongoing opportunities to engage in age- or developmentally appropriate activities, including consulting with the nonminor dependent about opportunities for the nonminor dependent to participate in those activities.SEC. 2. Section 388 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:388. (a) (1) Any parent or other person having an interest in a child who is a dependent child of the juvenile court or a nonminor dependent as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, or the child or the nonminor dependent through a properly appointed guardian may, upon grounds of change of circumstance or new evidence, petition the court in the same action in which the child was found to be a dependent child of the juvenile court or in which a guardianship was ordered pursuant to Section 360 for a hearing to change, modify, or set aside any order of court previously made or to terminate the jurisdiction of the court. The petition shall be verified and, if made by a person other than the child or the nonminor dependent, shall state the petitioner’s relationship to or interest in the child or the nonminor dependent and shall set forth in concise language any change of circumstance or new evidence that is alleged to require the change of order or termination of jurisdiction.(2) When any party, including a child who is a dependent of the juvenile court, petitions the court prior to an order terminating parental rights, to modify the order that reunification services were not needed pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 361.5, or to modify any orders related to custody or visitation of the subject child, and the court orders a hearing pursuant to subdivision (d), the court shall modify the order that reunification services were not needed pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 361.5, or any orders related to the custody or visitation of the child for whom reunification services were not ordered pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 361.5, only if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the proposed change is in the best interests of the child.(b) (1) Any person, including a child or a nonminor dependent who is a dependent of the juvenile court, may petition the court to assert a relationship as a sibling related by blood, adoption, or affinity through a common legal or biological parent to a child who is, or is the subject of a petition for adjudication as, a dependent of the juvenile court, and may request visitation with the dependent child, placement with or near the dependent child, or consideration when determining or implementing a case plan or permanent plan for the dependent child or make any other request for an order which may be shown to be in the best interest of the dependent child.(2) A child or nonminor dependent who is a dependent of the juvenile court may petition the court to assert a relationship as a sibling related by blood, adoption, or affinity through a common legal or biological parent to a child who is in the physical custody of a common legal or biological parent, and may request visitation with the nondependent sibling in parental custody.(3) Pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 16002, a request for sibling visitation may be granted unless it is determined by the court that sibling visitation is contrary to the safety and well-being of any of the siblings.(4) The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to file the petition for a dependent child asserting a sibling relationship pursuant to this subdivision if the court determines that the appointment is necessary for the best interests of the dependent child. The petition shall be verified and shall set forth the following:(A) Through which parent the dependent child is related to the sibling.(B) Whether the dependent child is related to the sibling by blood, adoption, or affinity.(C) The request or order that the petitioner is seeking.(D) Why that request or order is in the best interest of the dependent child.(c) (1) Any party, including a child who is a dependent of the juvenile court, may petition the court, prior to the hearing set pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 366.21 for a child described by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 361.5, or prior to the hearing set pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 366.21 for a child described by subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 361.5, to terminate court-ordered reunification services provided under subdivision (a) of Section 361.5 only if one of the following conditions exists:(A) It appears that a change of circumstance or new evidence exists that satisfies a condition set forth in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 361.5 justifying termination of court-ordered reunification services.(B) The action or inaction of the parent or guardian creates a substantial likelihood that reunification will not occur, including, but not limited to, the parent’s or guardian’s failure to visit the child, or the failure of the parent or guardian to participate regularly and make substantive progress in a court-ordered treatment plan.(2) In determining whether the parent or guardian has failed to visit the child or participate regularly or make progress in the treatment plan, the court shall consider factors that include, but are not limited to, the parent’s or guardian’s incarceration, institutionalization, detention by the United States Department of Homeland Security, deportation, or participation in a court-ordered residential substance abuse treatment program.(3) The court shall terminate reunification services during the above-described time periods only upon a finding by a preponderance of evidence that reasonable services have been offered or provided, and upon a finding of clear and convincing evidence that one of the conditions in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) exists.(4) Any party, including a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, may petition the court prior to the review hearing set pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 366.31 to terminate the continuation of court-ordered family reunification services for a nonminor dependent who has attained 18 years of age. The court shall terminate family reunification services to the parent or guardian if the nonminor dependent or parent or guardian are not in agreement that the continued provision of court-ordered family reunification services is in the best interests of the nonminor dependent.(5) If the court terminates reunification services, it shall order that a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26 be held within 120 days. On and after January 1, 2012, a hearing pursuant to Section 366.26 shall not be ordered if the child is a nonminor dependent. The court may order a nonminor dependent who is otherwise eligible for AFDC-FC benefits pursuant to Section 11403 to remain in a planned, permanent living arrangement.(d) If it appears that the best interests of the child or the nonminor dependent may be promoted by the proposed change of order, modification of reunification services, custody, or visitation orders concerning a child for whom reunification services were not ordered pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 361.5, recognition of a sibling relationship, termination of jurisdiction, or clear and convincing evidence supports revocation or termination of court-ordered reunification services, the court shall order that a hearing be held and shall give prior notice, or cause prior notice to be given, to the persons and in the manner prescribed by Section 386, and, in those instances in which the manner of giving notice is not prescribed by those sections, then in the manner the court prescribes.(e) (1) (A) A nonminor who attained 18 years of age while subject to an order for foster care placement and who has not attained 21 years of age, or as described in Section 10103.5, for whom the court has dismissed dependency jurisdiction pursuant to Section 391, or delinquency jurisdiction pursuant to Section 607.2, or transition jurisdiction pursuant to Section 452, but has retained general jurisdiction under subdivision (b) of Section 303, or the county child welfare services, probation department, or tribal placing agency on behalf of the nonminor, may petition the court in the same action in which the child was found to be a dependent or delinquent child of the juvenile court, for a hearing to resume the dependency jurisdiction over a former dependent or to assume or resume transition jurisdiction over a former delinquent ward pursuant to Section 450. The petition shall be filed within the period that the nonminor is of the age described in this paragraph. If the nonminor has completed the voluntary reentry agreement, as described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400, with the placing agency, the agency shall file the petition on behalf of the nonminor within 15 judicial days of the date the agreement was signed unless the nonminor elects to file the petition at an earlier date.(B) The petition may be brought notwithstanding a court order vacating or dismissing the underlying adjudication pursuant to Section 236.14 of the Penal Code or Section 782 of this code.(2) (A) The petition to resume jurisdiction may be filed in the juvenile court that retains general jurisdiction under subdivision (b) of Section 303, or the petition may be submitted to the juvenile court in the county where the youth resides and forwarded to the juvenile court that retained general jurisdiction and filed with that court. The juvenile court having general jurisdiction under Section 303 shall receive the petition from the court where the petition was submitted within five court days of its submission, if the petition is filed in the county of residence. The juvenile court that retained general jurisdiction shall order that a hearing be held within 15 judicial days of the date the petition was filed if there is a prima facie showing that the nonminor satisfies the following criteria:(i) The nonminor was previously under juvenile court jurisdiction, subject to an order for foster care placement when the nonminor attained 18 years of age, and has not attained 21 years of age.(ii) The nonminor intends to satisfy at least one of the conditions set forth in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.(iii) The nonminor wants assistance either in maintaining or securing appropriate supervised placement, or is in need of immediate placement and agrees to supervised placement pursuant to the voluntary reentry agreement as described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400.(B) Upon ordering a hearing, the court shall give prior notice, or cause prior notice to be given, to the persons and by the means prescribed by Section 386, except that notice to parents or former guardians shall not be provided unless the nonminor requests, in writing on the face of the petition, notice to the parents or former guardians.(3) The Judicial Council, by January 1, 2012, shall adopt rules of court to allow for telephonic appearances by nonminor former dependents or delinquents in these proceedings, and for telephonic appearances by nonminor dependents in any proceeding in which the nonminor dependent is a party, and the nonminor declines to appear and elects a telephonic appearance.(4) Prior to the hearing on a petition to resume dependency jurisdiction or to assume or resume transition jurisdiction, the court shall order the county child welfare or probation department to prepare a report for the court addressing whether the nonminor intends to satisfy at least one of the criteria set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 11403. When the recommendation is for the nonminor dependent to be placed in a setting where minor dependents also reside, the results of a background check of the petitioning nonminor conducted pursuant to Section 16504.5 may be used by the placing agency to determine appropriate placement options for the nonminor. The existence of a criminal conviction is not a bar to eligibility for reentry or resumption of dependency jurisdiction or the assumption or resumption of transition jurisdiction over a nonminor.(5) (A) The court shall resume dependency jurisdiction over a former dependent or assume or resume transition jurisdiction over a former delinquent ward pursuant to Section 450, and order that the nonminor’s placement and care be under the responsibility of the county child welfare services department, the probation department, tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization, if the court finds all of the following:(i) The nonminor was previously under juvenile court jurisdiction, subject to an order for foster care placement when the nonminor attained 18 years of age.(ii) The nonminor has not attained 21 years of age.(iii) Reentry and remaining in foster care are in the nonminor’s best interests.(iv) The nonminor intends to satisfy, and agrees to satisfy, at least one of the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403, and demonstrates their agreement to placement in a supervised setting under the placement and care responsibility of the placing agency and to satisfy the criteria by signing the voluntary reentry agreement as described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400.(B) In no event shall the court grant a continuance that would cause the hearing to resume dependency jurisdiction or to assume or resume transition jurisdiction to be completed more than 120 days after the date the petition was filed.(C) The agency made responsible for the nonminor’s placement and care pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall prepare a new transitional independent living case plan within 60 calendar days from the date the nonminor signed the voluntary reentry agreement as described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400 and submit it to the court for the review hearing under Section 366.31, to be held within 70 days of the resumption of dependency jurisdiction or assumption or resumption of transition jurisdiction. In no event shall the review hearing under Section 366.3 be held more than 170 calendar days from the date the nonminor signed the voluntary reentry agreement.(f) (1) For any nonminor dependent who attained 18 years of age while subject to an order for foster care placement and who has not attained 21 years of age, and who, prior to attaining 18 years of age, was not eligible for federal financial participation, as defined in Section 11402.1, the county child welfare, probation, or tribal placing agency may, on behalf of, and with the consent of, the nonminor dependent, petition the court to dismiss its dependency or transition jurisdiction and immediately resume dependency or transition jurisdiction in order to establish the nonminor dependent’s eligibility for federal financial participation.(2) A petition filed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include notice to the nonminor dependent and the nonminor dependent’s attorney.(3) If the court grants a petition filed pursuant to paragraph (1), the court shall, upon terminating its dependency or transition jurisdiction, maintain general jurisdiction over the nonminor dependent pursuant to Section 303 and immediately resume dependency or transition jurisdiction. The court may grant the petition without a hearing.(4) Sections 391, 452, and 607.2 do not apply to a petition filed pursuant to paragraph (1).(5) Following the granting of a petition filed pursuant to paragraph (1), a new agreement for extended foster care shall be jointly signed by the agency responsible for the nonminor dependent’s placement and care and the nonminor dependent. However, notwithstanding any other law, if the nonminor dependent established a transitional independent living plan prior to the granting of the petition, the agency shall not be required to prepare a new transitional independent living plan as described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (e).(6) The county child welfare, probation, or tribal placing agency shall ensure that a nonminor dependent does not experience a break in services or supports before, during, or after the filing or granting of a petition described in paragraph (1).(7) A county child welfare, probation, or tribal placing agency shall not file a petition described in paragraph (1) if either of the following circumstances is present:(A) The nonminor dependent is categorically ineligible for federal AFDC-FC benefits.(B) The nonminor dependent is a member of a tribe and would likely become ineligible for services or supports, or have benefits disrupted, if the county sought to establish eligibility for federal financial participation pursuant to paragraph (1).(8) By September 1, 2022, the Judicial Council shall develop and implement rules, and develop and adopt appropriate forms, as necessary to implement this subdivision.(9) The director shall, by July 1, 2022, seek any federal approvals necessary for implementation of this subdivision.SEC. 3. Section 388.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:388.1. (a) A nonminor who has not attained 21 years of age may petition the court in which he or she was the nonminor previously found to be a dependent or delinquent child of the juvenile court for a hearing to determine whether to assume dependency jurisdiction over the nonminor, if he or she the nonminor meets any of the following descriptions:(1) He or she The nonminor is a nonminor former dependent, as defined in subdivision (aa) of Section 11400, who received or, but for the receipt of Supplemental Security Income benefits or other aid from the federal Social Security Administration, would have received aid after attaining 18 years of age under Kin-GAP pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9, or AFDC-FC pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11405, and whose former guardian or guardians died after the nonminor attained 18 years of age, but before he or she the nonminor attains 21 years of age.(2) He or she The nonminor is a nonminor former dependent, as defined in subdivision (aa) of Section 11400, who received or, but for the receipt of Supplemental Security Income benefits or other aid from the federal Social Security Administration, would have received aid after attaining 18 years of age under Kin-GAP pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9, or AFDC-FC pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11405, and whose former guardian or guardians no longer provide ongoing support to, and no longer receive aid on behalf of, the nonminor after the nonminor attained 18 years of age, but before he or she the nonminor attains 21 years of age.(3) He or she is a The nonminor who received adoption assistance payments after attaining 18 years of age pursuant to Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4 of Division 9 and his or her their adoptive parent or parents died after the nonminor attained 18 years of age, but before he or she the nonminor attains 21 years of age.(4) He or she is a The nonminor who received adoption assistance payments after attaining 18 years of age pursuant to Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4 of Division 9 and his or her their adoptive parent or parents no longer provide ongoing support to, and no longer receive benefits on behalf of, the nonminor after the nonminor attained 18 years of age, but before he or she the nonminor attains 21 years of age.(b) (1) The petition to assume jurisdiction may be filed in either of the following:(A) The juvenile court that established the guardianship pursuant to Section 360, Section 366.26, or subdivision (d) of Section 728.(B) The juvenile court that had jurisdiction over the minor or nonminor dependent when his or her their adoption was finalized.(2) A nonminor described in subdivision (a) may submit a petition to assume dependency jurisdiction to the juvenile court in the county where he or she the nonminor resides. A petition submitted pursuant to this paragraph shall, within five days of submission, be forwarded to the court that had jurisdiction over the child at the time of the guardianship or adoption. The clerk of the court that had jurisdiction over the child at the time of the guardianship or adoption shall file the petition within one judicial day of receipt.(c) (1) The juvenile court in which the petition was filed shall order a hearing to be held within 15 judicial days of the date the petition was filed if there is a prima facie showing that the nonminor satisfies all of the following criteria:(A) He or she The nonminor was a minor under juvenile court jurisdiction at the time of the establishment of a guardianship pursuant to Section 360, Section 366.26, or subdivision (d) of Section 728, or he or she the nonminor was a minor or nonminor dependent when his or her their adoption was finalized.(B) (i) His or her The nonminor’s guardian or guardians, or adoptive parent or parents, as applicable, died after the nonminor attained 18 years of age, but before he or she the nonminor attained 21 years of age.(ii) His or her The nonminor’s guardian or guardians, or adoptive parent or parents, as applicable, no longer provide ongoing support to, and no longer receive payment on behalf of, the nonminor after the nonminor attained 18 years of age, but before he or she the nonminor attained 21 years of age, and it may be in the nonminor’s best interest for the court to assume dependency jurisdiction.(C) He or she The nonminor intends to satisfy at least one of the conditions set forth in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.(D) He or she The nonminor is requesting assistance in maintaining or securing appropriate supervised placement, or needs immediate placement and agrees to supervised placement pursuant to the voluntary reentry agreement described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400.(2) Upon ordering a hearing, the court shall give prior notice, or cause prior notice to be given, to the nonminor, the appropriate child welfare agency or probation department, and any other person requested by the nonminor in the petition.(3) Pursuant to applicable rules of court, the juvenile court shall allow for telephonic appearances by the nonminor in these proceedings and in any proceeding in which the nonminor dependent is a party.(4) Prior to the hearing, the court shall order the county child welfare or probation department to prepare a report for the court that addresses both of the following:(A) The nonminor’s plans to satisfy at least one of the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.(B) The appropriate placement setting for the nonminor. When If the recommendation is for the nonminor to be placed in a setting where minor dependents also reside, the results of a background check of the petitioning nonminor conducted pursuant to Section 16504.5 may be used by the placing agency to determine appropriate placement options for him or her. the nonminor.(5) The court shall assume dependency jurisdiction over a former dependent or ward, and order his or her their placement and care be under the responsibility of the county child welfare services department, the probation department, tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization, if the court finds all of the following:(A) The nonminor was a minor under juvenile court jurisdiction at the time of the establishment of a guardianship pursuant to Section 360, Section 366.26, or subdivision (d) of Section 728, or he or she the nonminor was a dependent at the time his or her their adoption was finalized.(B) The nonminor’s guardian or guardians, or adoptive parent or parents, as applicable, have died, or no longer provide ongoing support to, and no longer receive payment on behalf of, the nonminor, and it is in the nonminor’s best interests for the court to assume dependency jurisdiction.(C) The nonminor has not attained 21 years of age.(D) Reentry and remaining in foster care are in the nonminor’s best interests.(E) The nonminor intends to satisfy, and agrees to satisfy, at least one of the criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403, and demonstrates his or her their agreement to placement in a supervised setting under the placement and care responsibility of the placing agency by signing the voluntary reentry agreement described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400.(6) The existence of a criminal conviction is not a bar to eligibility for reentry to foster care or assumption of dependency jurisdiction over a nonminor.(7) The court shall not grant a continuance that would cause the hearing to be completed more than 120 days after the date the petition is filed.(d) The agency made responsible for the nonminor’s placement and care pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) shall prepare a new transitional independent living case plan within 60 calendar days of the date the nonminor signs the voluntary reentry agreement and shall submit the plan to the court for the review hearing specified in Section 366.31, to be held within 70 days of the assumption of dependency jurisdiction. The review hearing under Section 366.31 shall not be held more than 170 calendar days from the date the nonminor signs the voluntary reentry agreement.(e) (1) A nonminor described in subdivision (a) may enter into a voluntary reentry agreement as defined in subdivision (z) of Section 11400 in order to establish eligibility for foster care benefits under subdivision (e) of Section 11401 before or after filing a petition to assume dependency jurisdiction. If the nonminor enters into a voluntary reentry agreement prior to filing the petition, the nonminor is entitled to placement and supervision pending the court’s assumption of jurisdiction.(2) If the nonminor completes a voluntary reentry agreement with a placing agency, the placing agency shall file the petition to assume dependency jurisdiction on behalf of the nonminor within 15 judicial days of the date the agreement is signed, unless the nonminor elects to file the petition at an earlier date.SEC. 4. Section 391 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:391. (a) (1) At the first regularly scheduled review hearing held pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 366.3 after a dependent child has attained 16 years of age, the county welfare department shall submit a report verifying that the following information, documents, and services have been provided to the child:(A) Social security card, if provided to the child pursuant to paragraph (2).(B)  Copy of the birth certificate.(C) Driver’s license, as described in Section 12500 of the Vehicle Code, or identification card, as described in Section 13000 of the Vehicle Code.(D) Assistance in obtaining employment, if applicable.(E) Assistance in applying for, or preparing to apply for, admission to college or to a vocational training program or other educational institution and in obtaining financial aid, where applicable.(F) Written information notifying the child that current or former dependent children who are or have been in foster care are granted a preference for student assistant or internship positions with state agencies pursuant to Section 18220 of the Government Code, or with participating county agencies pursuant to Section 31000.11 of the Government Code, until the child attains 26 years of age.(G) Written information notifying the child of any financial literacy programs or other available resources provided through the county or other community organizations to help the youth obtain financial literacy skills, including, but not limited to, banking, credit card debt, student loan debt, credit scores, credit history, and personal savings.(2) Except as required by subdivision (b), the child’s social security card may only be provided temporarily to the dependent child for the following purposes:(A) To enable the child to obtain employment.(B) To apply for admission to an institution of postsecondary education or a vocational training program.(C) To apply for financial aid.(D) To apply for or access public benefits.(E) As otherwise determined by the child’s caseworker, including, but not limited to, in response to a request from the child.(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a certified copy of the dependent child’s birth certificate shall be provided upon request of the child.(b) At the last regularly scheduled review hearing held pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 366.3 before a dependent child attains 18 years of age, the county welfare department shall submit a report verifying that the following information, documents, and services have been provided to the minor or nonminor:(1) Social security card.(2) Certified copy of the birth certificate.(3) Driver’s license, as described in Section 12500 of the Vehicle Code, or identification card, as described in Section 13000 of the Vehicle Code.(4) Medi-Cal Benefits Identification Card.(5) A letter prepared by the county welfare department that includes the following information:(A) The minor’s or nonminor’s name and date of birth.(B) The dates during which the minor or nonminor was within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.(C) A statement that the minor or nonminor was a foster youth in compliance with state and federal financial aid documentation requirements.(6) If applicable, the death certificate of the parent or parents.(7) If applicable, proof of the minor’s or nonminor’s citizenship or legal residence.(8) An advance health care directive form.(9) The Judicial Council form that the minor or nonminor would use to file a petition pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 to resume dependency jurisdiction.(10) Written information notifying the minor or nonminor that they may be eligible to receive CalFresh benefits, and where the minor or nonminor can apply for CalFresh benefits.(c) At the last regularly scheduled review hearing held pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 366.3 before a dependent child attains 18 years of age, and at every regularly scheduled review hearing thereafter, the county welfare department shall submit a report describing efforts toward providing the following information, documents, and services to the minor or nonminor:(1) Assistance in obtaining employment, if applicable.(2) Assistance in applying for, or preparing to apply for, admission to college or to a vocational training program or other educational institution and in obtaining financial aid, where applicable.(3) Written information notifying the child that a current or former dependent child who is or has been in foster care is granted a preference for student assistant or internship positions with state agencies pursuant to Section 18220 of the Government Code, or with participating county agencies pursuant to Section 31000.11 of the Government Code, until the child attains 26 years of age.(4) Written information notifying the child that youth exiting foster care at 18 years of age or older are eligible for Medi-Cal until they reach 26 years of age, regardless of income, and are not required to submit an application.(5) Written information notifying the child of any financial literacy programs or other available resources provided through the county or other community organizations to help the youth obtain financial literacy skills, including, but not limited to, banking, credit card debt, student loan debt, credit scores, credit history, and personal savings.(6) (A) If applicable, referrals to transitional housing, if available, or assistance in securing other housing.(B) Whether the referrals or assistance as described in subparagraph (A) have resulted in housing being secured for the minor or nonminor, and, if not, what, if any, different or additional referrals or assistance the department has provided that are intended to secure housing.(C) The duration of the housing, if known to the department.(D) If applicable, information, including summaries, describing additional referrals, assistance, or services provided by county departments or agencies other than the county welfare department that are intended to prevent the minor or nonminor from becoming homeless if jurisdiction is terminated pursuant to this section.(E) The information described in subparagraphs (B) to (D), inclusive, is required only for reports submitted at the last regularly scheduled review hearing held pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 366.3 before a dependent child attains 18 years of age.(7) Assistance in maintaining relationships with individuals who are important to a minor or nonminor who has been in out-of-home placement for six months or longer from the date the minor or nonminor entered foster care, based on the minor’s or nonminor’s best interests.(8) The whereabouts of any siblings under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, unless the court determines that sibling contact would jeopardize the safety or welfare of either sibling.(d) The dependency court shall not terminate jurisdiction over a nonminor unless a hearing is conducted pursuant to this section. At any hearing at which the court is considering terminating jurisdiction over a nonminor, the county welfare department shall do all of the following:(1) Ensure that the dependent nonminor is present in court, unless the nonminor does not wish to appear in court and elects a telephonic appearance, or document reasonable efforts made by the county welfare department to locate the nonminor when the nonminor is not available.(2) Submit a report describing whether it is in the nonminor’s best interests to remain under the court’s dependency jurisdiction, which includes a recommended transitional independent living case plan for the nonminor when the report describes continuing dependency jurisdiction as being in the nonminor’s best interest.(3) If the county welfare department recommends termination of the court’s dependency jurisdiction, submit documentation of the reasonable efforts made by the department to provide the nonminor with the assistance needed to meet or maintain eligibility as a nonminor dependent, as defined in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.(4) If the nonminor has indicated that they do not want dependency jurisdiction to continue, the report shall address the manner in which the nonminor was advised of their options, including the benefits of remaining in foster care, and of their right to reenter foster care and to file a petition pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 to resume dependency jurisdiction prior to attaining 21 years of age.(e) (1) The court shall continue dependency jurisdiction over a nonminor who meets the definition of a nonminor dependent as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400 unless the court finds either of the following:(A) That the nonminor does not wish to remain subject to dependency jurisdiction.(B) That the nonminor is not participating in a reasonable and appropriate transitional independent living case plan.(2) In making the findings pursuant to paragraph (1), the court shall also find that the nonminor has been informed of their options including the benefits of remaining in foster care and the right to reenter foster care by filing a petition pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 to resume dependency jurisdiction and by completing a voluntary reentry agreement pursuant to subdivision (z) of Section 11400, and has had an opportunity to confer with their counsel if counsel has been appointed pursuant to Section 317.(f) The court may terminate its jurisdiction over a nonminor if the court finds after reasonable and documented efforts the nonminor cannot be located.(g) When terminating dependency jurisdiction, the court shall maintain general jurisdiction over the nonminor to allow for the filing of a petition to resume dependency jurisdiction under subdivision (e) of Section 388 until the nonminor attains 21 years of age, although no review proceedings shall be required. A nonminor may petition the court pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 to resume dependency jurisdiction at any time before attaining 21 years of age.(h) The court shall not terminate dependency jurisdiction over a nonminor dependent who has attained 18 years of age until a hearing is conducted pursuant to this section. Jurisdiction shall not be terminated until the department has submitted a report verifying that the information, documents, and services required under subdivisions (a) and (b), as well as the following information, documents, and services, have been provided to the nonminor, or in the case of a nonminor who, after reasonable efforts by the county welfare department, cannot be located, verifying the efforts made to make the following available to the nonminor:(1) Assistance in accessing the Independent Living Aftercare Program in the nonminor’s county of residence, and, upon the nonminor’s request, assistance in completing a voluntary reentry agreement for care and placement pursuant to subdivision (z) of Section 11400 and in filing a petition pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 to resume dependency jurisdiction.(2) Written information concerning the nonminor’s dependency case, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(A) Any known information regarding the nonminor’s Indian heritage or tribal connections.(B) The nonminor’s family history and placement history.(C) Any photographs of the nonminor or the family of the nonminor in the possession of the county welfare department, other than forensic photographs.(D) Directions on how to access the documents the nonminor is entitled to inspect under Section 827.(E) The written 90-day transition plan prepared pursuant to Section 16501.1.(F) The date on which the jurisdiction of the juvenile court would be terminated.(3) The health and education summary described in subdivision (a) of Section 16010.(4) The Judicial Council form that the nonminor would use to file a petition pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 to resume dependency jurisdiction.(5) Written verification that the eligible nonminor is enrolled in Medi-Cal and the nonminor’s Medi-Cal Benefits Identification Card.(6) Continued and uninterrupted enrollment in Medi-Cal for eligible nonminors pursuant to Section 14005.28 or 14005.285.(7) Assistance with the following:(A) Referrals to transitional housing, if available, or assistance in securing other housing.(B) Obtaining employment or other financial support, if applicable.(8) The report described in this subdivision, as it relates to the assistance described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (7), shall include the following:(A) Whether the referral or assistance has resulted in housing being secured for the minor or nonminor, and, if not, what, if any, different or additional assistance the department has provided that is intended to secure housing.(B) The duration of the housing, if known to the department.(C) If applicable, information, including summaries, describing additional referrals, assistance, or services provided by county departments or agencies other than the county welfare department that are intended to prevent the minor or nonminor from becoming homeless if jurisdiction is terminated pursuant to this section.SEC. 5. Section 727.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:727.2. The purpose of this section is to provide a means to monitor the safety and well-being of every minor in foster care who has been declared a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601 or 602 and to ensure that everything reasonably possible is done to facilitate the safe and early return of the minor to the minor’s home or to establish an alternative permanent plan for the minor.(a) If the court orders the care, custody, and control of the minor to be under the supervision of the probation officer for placement pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 727, the juvenile court shall order the probation department to ensure the provision of reunification services to facilitate the safe return of the minor to the minor’s home or the permanent placement of the minor, and to address the needs of the minor while in foster care, except as provided in subdivision (b).(b) (1) Reunification services need not be provided to a parent or legal guardian if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that one or more of the following is true:(A) Reunification services were previously terminated for that parent or guardian, pursuant to Section 366.21, 366.22, or 366.25, or not offered, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 361.5, in reference to the same minor.(B) The parent has been convicted of any of the following:(i) Murder of another child of the parent.(ii) Voluntary manslaughter of another child of the parent.(iii) Aiding or abetting, attempting, conspiring, or soliciting to commit that murder or manslaughter described in clause (i) or (ii).(iv) A felony assault that results in serious bodily injury to the minor or another child of the parent.(C) The parental rights of the parent with respect to a sibling have been terminated involuntarily, and it is not in the best interest of the minor to reunify with the minor’s parent or legal guardian.(2) If no reunification services are offered to the parent or guardian, the permanency planning hearing, as described in Section 727.3, shall occur within 30 days of the date of the hearing at which the decision is made not to offer services.(c) The status of every minor declared a ward and ordered to be placed in foster care shall be reviewed by the court no less frequently than once every six months. The six-month time periods shall be calculated from the date the minor entered foster care, as defined in paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 727.4. If the court so elects, the court may declare the hearing at which the court orders the care, custody, and control of the minor to be under the supervision of the probation officer for foster care placement pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 727 at the first status review hearing. It shall be the duty of the probation officer to prepare a written social study report pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 706.5, including an updated case plan, as described in Section 706.6, and submit the report to the court prior to each status review hearing, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 727.4. The social study report shall include all reports the probation officer relied upon in making their recommendations.(d) Prior to any status review hearing involving a minor in the physical custody of a community care facility or foster family agency, the facility or agency may provide the probation officer with a report containing its recommendations. Prior to any status review hearing involving the physical custody of a foster parent, relative caregiver, preadoptive parent, or legal guardian, that person may present to the court a report containing the person’s recommendations. The court shall consider all reports and recommendations filed pursuant to subdivision (c) and pursuant to this subdivision.(e) At any status review hearing prior to the first permanency planning hearing, the court shall consider the safety of the minor and make findings and orders which determine the following:(1) The continuing necessity for and appropriateness of the placement. If the minor or nonminor dependent is placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program on or after October 1, 2021, or a community treatment facility on or after July 1, 2022, the court shall consider the evidence and documentation submitted in the social study pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 706.5 in making this determination.(2) The extent of the probation department’s compliance with the case plan in making reasonable efforts, or in the case of a child 16 years of age or older with another planned permanent living arrangement, the ongoing and intensive efforts to safely return the minor to the minor’s home or to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the minor.(3) Whether there should be any limitation on the right of the parent or guardian to make educational decisions for the minor. That limitation shall be specifically addressed in the court order and may not exceed what is necessary to protect the minor. If the court specifically limits the right of the parent or guardian to make educational decisions for the minor, the court shall at the same time appoint a responsible adult to make educational decisions for the minor pursuant to Section 726.(4) The extent of progress that has been made by the minor and parent or guardian toward alleviating or mitigating the causes necessitating placement in foster care.(5) The likely date by which the minor may be returned to and safely maintained in the home or placed for adoption, appointed a legal guardian, permanently placed with a fit and willing relative, or, if the minor is 16 years of age or older, referred to another planned permanent living arrangement.(6) (A) In the case of a minor who has reached 16 years of age, the court shall, in addition, determine the services needed to assist the minor to make the transition from foster care to successful adulthood.(B) The court shall make these determinations on a case-by-case basis and reference in its written findings the probation officer’s report and any other evidence relied upon in reaching its decision.(7) (A) For a child who is 10 years of age or older, is in junior high, middle, or high school, and has been declared a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601 or 602 for a year or longer whether the probation officer has taken the actions described in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 366.(B) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall amend and adopt rules of court and develop appropriate forms for the implementation of this paragraph.(8) For a child who is 16 years of age or older or for a nonminor dependent, whether the probation officer has, pursuant to the requirements of paragraph (22) of subdivision (g) of Section 16501.1, identified the person or persons who shall be responsible for assisting the child or nonminor dependent with applications for postsecondary education and related financial aid, or that the child or nonminor dependent stated that they do not want to pursue postsecondary education, including career or technical education.(f) At any status review hearing prior to the first permanency hearing, after considering the admissible and relevant evidence, the court shall order return of the minor to the physical custody of the minor’s parent or legal guardian unless the court finds, by a preponderance of evidence, that the return of the minor to the minor’s parent or legal guardian would create a substantial risk of detriment to the safety, protection, or physical or emotional well-being of the minor. The probation department shall have the burden of establishing that detriment. In making its determination, the court shall review and consider the social study report, recommendations, and the case plan pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 706.5, the report and recommendations of any child advocate appointed for the minor in the case, and any other reports submitted to the court pursuant to subdivision (d), and shall consider the efforts or progress, or both, demonstrated by the minor and family and the extent to which the minor availed themselves of the services provided.(g) At all status review hearings subsequent to the first permanency planning hearing, the court shall consider the safety of the minor and make the findings and orders as described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, and (6) of subdivision (e). The court shall either make a finding that the previously ordered permanent plan continues to be appropriate or shall order that a new permanent plan be adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 727.3. However, the court shall not order a permanent plan of “return to the physical custody of the parent or legal guardian after further reunification services are offered,” as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 727.3.(h) The status review hearings required by subdivision (c) may be heard by an administrative review panel, provided that the administrative panel meets all of the requirements listed in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (7) of subdivision (d) of Section 727.4.(i) (1) At any status review hearing at which a recommendation to terminate delinquency jurisdiction is being considered, or at the status review hearing held closest to the ward attaining 18 years of age, but no fewer than 90 days before the ward’s 18th birthday, the court shall consider whether to modify its jurisdiction pursuant to Section 601 or 602 and assume transition jurisdiction over the minor pursuant to Section 450. The probation department shall address this issue in its report to the court and make a recommendation as to whether transition jurisdiction is appropriate for the minor.(2) The court shall order the probation department or the minor’s attorney to submit an application to the child welfare services department pursuant to Section 329 to declare the minor a dependent of the court and modify its jurisdiction from delinquency to dependency jurisdiction if it finds both of the following:(A) The ward does not come within the description set forth in Section 450, but jurisdiction as a ward may no longer be required.(B) The ward appears to come within the description of Section 300 and cannot be returned home safely.(3) The court shall set a hearing within 20 judicial days of the date of its order issued pursuant to paragraph (2) to review the decision of the child welfare services department and may either affirm the decision not to file a petition pursuant to Section 300 or order the child welfare services department to file a petition pursuant to Section 300.(j) If a review hearing pursuant to this section is the last review hearing to be held before the minor attains 18 years of age, the court shall ensure that the minor’s transitional independent living case plan includes a plan for the minor to meet one or more of the criteria in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403, so that the minor can become a nonminor dependent, and that the minor has been informed of the minor’s right to decline to become a nonminor dependent and to seek termination of the court’s jurisdiction pursuant to Section 607.2.SEC. 6. Section 11363 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:11363. (a) Aid in the form of state-funded Kin-GAP shall be provided under this article on behalf of any child under 18 years of age and to any eligible youth under 19 years of age, as provided in Section 11403, who satisfies all of the following conditions:(1) Has been adjudged a dependent child of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300, or, effective October 1, 2006, a ward of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 601 or 602.(2) Has been residing for at least six consecutive months in the approved home of the prospective relative guardian, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 11362, while under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court or a voluntary placement agreement.(3) Has had a kinship guardianship established pursuant to Section 360 or 366.26.(4) Has had their dependency jurisdiction terminated after January 1, 2000, pursuant to Section 366.3, or their wardship terminated pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 728, concurrently or subsequently to the establishment of the kinship guardianship.(b) If the conditions specified in subdivision (a) are met and, subsequent to the termination of dependency jurisdiction, any parent or person having an interest files with the juvenile court a petition pursuant to Section 388 to change, modify, or set aside an order of the court, Kin-GAP payments shall continue unless and until the juvenile court, after holding a hearing, orders the child removed from the home of the guardian, terminates the guardianship, or resumes dependency jurisdiction after the court concludes the hearing on the petition filed under Section 388.(c) A child or nonminor former dependent or ward shall be eligible for Kin-GAP payments if the child or nonminor former dependent meets one of the following age criteria:(1) The person is under 18 years of age.(2) The person is under 21 years of age and has a physical or mental disability that warrants the continuation of assistance.(3) Through December 31, 2011, the person satisfies the conditions of Section 11403, and on and after January 1, 2012, the person satisfies the conditions of Section 11403.01.(4) The person satisfies the conditions as described in subdivision (d).(d) Commencing January 1, 2012, state-funded Kin-GAP payments shall continue for youths who have attained 18 years of age and who are under 19 years of age, if they reached 16 years of age before the Kin-GAP negotiated agreement payments commenced, and as described in Section 10103.5. Effective January 1, 2013, Kin-GAP payments shall continue for youths who have attained 18 years of age and are under 20 years of age, if they reached 16 years of age before the Kin-GAP negotiated agreement payments commenced, and as described in Section 10103.5. Effective January 1, 2014, Kin-GAP payments shall continue for youths who have attained 18 years of age and are under 21 years of age, if they reached 16 years of age before the Kin-GAP negotiated agreement payments commenced. To be eligible for continued payments, the youth shall satisfy one or more of the conditions specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.(e) (1) Termination of the guardianship with a kinship guardian shall terminate eligibility for Kin-GAP unless the conditions in Section 11403 apply. However, an alternate guardian or coguardian is appointed pursuant to Section 366.3 who is also a kinship guardian, the alternate or coguardian shall be entitled to receive Kin-GAP on behalf of the child pursuant to this article. A new period of six months of placement with the alternate guardian or coguardian shall not be required if that alternate guardian or coguardian has been assessed pursuant to Section 361.3, subdivision (a) of Section 361.4, and paragraph (2), and the court terminates dependency jurisdiction. If a nonminor former dependent is receiving Kin-GAP after 18 years of age and the nonminor former dependent’s former guardian dies, the nonminor former dependent may petition the court for a hearing pursuant to Section 388.1.(2) (A) In addition to the state-level criminal records check described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 361.4, the county welfare department shall require each prospective alternate guardian or coguardian, and any other person over 18 years of age living in the home, to be fingerprinted, and shall secure from an appropriate law enforcement agency any criminal record of that person to determine whether the person has ever been convicted of a crime other than a minor traffic violation.(B) If the criminal records check indicates that the prospective alternate guardian or coguardian has been convicted of an offense described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the case shall not be eligible for Kin-GAP funding.(C) If the prospective alternate guardian or coguardian has been convicted of a crime other than a minor traffic violation or arrested for an offense specified in subdivision (e) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, except for the civil penalty language, the criminal background check provisions specified in subdivisions (d) to (g), inclusive, of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code shall apply, and an exemption shall be issued prior to issuance of any Kin-GAP funding. Exemptions from the criminal records clearance requirements set forth in this section may be granted by the county using the exemption criteria specified in subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code and any applicable written directives or regulations adopted by the department.(3) A prospective alternate guardian or coguardian shall not be required to be approved as a resource family pursuant to Section 16519.5 for the sole purpose of receiving Kin-GAP funding on behalf of an eligible child in the care of the prospective alternate guardian or coguardian.SEC. 7. Section 11386 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:11386. Aid shall be provided under this article on behalf of a child under 18 years of age, and to any eligible youth under 19 years of age, as provided in Section 11403, under all of the following conditions:(a) The child satisfies both of the following requirements:(1) He or she The child has been removed from his or her their home pursuant to a voluntary placement agreement, or as a result of judicial determination, including being adjudged a dependent child of the court, pursuant to Section 300, or a ward of the court, pursuant to Section 601 or 602, to the effect that continuation in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child.(2) He or she The child has been eligible for federal foster care maintenance payments under Article 5 (commencing with Section 11400) while residing for at least six consecutive months in the approved home of the prospective relative guardian while under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court or a voluntary placement agreement.(b) Being returned to the parental home or being adopted are not appropriate permanency options for the child.(c) The child demonstrates a strong attachment to the relative guardian, and the relative guardian has a strong commitment to caring permanently for the child and, with respect to the child who has attained 12 years of age, the child has been consulted regarding the kinship guardianship arrangement.(d) The child has had a kinship guardianship established pursuant to Section 360 or 366.26.(e) The child has had his or her their dependency jurisdiction terminated pursuant to Section 366.3, or his or her their wardship terminated pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 728, concurrently or subsequently to the establishment of the kinship guardianship.(f) If the conditions specified in subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, are met and, subsequent to the termination of dependency jurisdiction, any parent or person having an interest files with the juvenile court a petition pursuant to Section 388 to change, modify, or set aside an order of the court, Kin-GAP payments shall continue unless and until the juvenile court orders the child removed from the home of the guardian, terminates the guardianship, or maintains dependency jurisdiction after the court concludes the hearing on the petition filed under Section 388.(g) A child or nonminor former dependent or ward shall be eligible for Kin-GAP payments if he or she meets they meet one of the following age criteria:(1) He or she is They are under 18 years of age.(2) He or she is They are under 21 years of age and has a physical or mental disability that warrants the continuation of assistance.(3) Through December 31, 2011, he or she satisfies they satisfy the conditions of Section 11403, and on and after January 1, 2012, he or she satisfies they satisfy the conditions of Section 11403.01.(4) He or she satisfies They satisfy the conditions described in subdivision (h).(h) Effective January 1, 2012, Kin-GAP payments shall continue for youths who have attained 18 years of age and are under 19 years of age, if they reached 16 years of age before the Kin-GAP negotiated agreement payments commenced, and as described in Section 10103.5. Effective January 1, 2013, Kin-GAP payments shall continue for youths who have attained 18 years of age and are under 20 years of age, if they reached 16 years of age before the Kin-GAP negotiated agreement payments commenced, and as described in Section 10103.5. Effective January 1, 2014, Kin-GAP payments shall continue for youths who have attained 18 years of age and are under 21 years of age, if they reached 16 years of age before the Kin-GAP negotiated agreement payments commenced. To be eligible for continued payments, the youth shall satisfy one or more of the conditions specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.(i) (1) Termination of the guardianship with a kinship guardian shall terminate eligibility for Kin-GAP, unless the conditions of Section 11403 apply. However, if a successor guardian is appointed pursuant to Section 366.3 who is also a kinship guardian, the successor guardian shall be entitled to receive Kin-GAP on behalf of the child pursuant to this article if the reason for the appointment of the successor guardian is the death or incapacity of the kinship guardian and the successor guardian is named in the kinship guardianship assistance agreement or amendment to the agreement. A new period of six months of placement with the successor guardian shall not be required if that successor guardian has been assessed pursuant to Section 361.3, subdivision (a) of Section 361.4, and paragraph (2), and the court terminates dependency jurisdiction, subject to federal approval of amendments to the state plan.(2) (A) In addition to the state-level criminal records check described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 361.4, the county welfare department shall require each prospective successor guardian, and any other person over 18 years of age living in the home, to be fingerprinted, and shall secure from an appropriate law enforcement agency any criminal record of that person to determine whether the person has ever been convicted of a crime other than a minor traffic violation.(B) If the criminal records check indicates that the prospective successor guardian has been convicted of an offense described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, the case shall not be eligible for Kin-GAP funding.(C) If the proposed successor guardian has been convicted of a crime other than a minor traffic violation or arrested for an offense specified in subdivision (e) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, except for the civil penalty language, the criminal background check provisions specified in subdivisions (d) to (g), inclusive, of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code shall apply, and an exemption shall be issued prior to issuance of any Kin-GAP funding. Exemptions from the criminal records clearance requirements set forth in this section may be granted by the county using the exemption criteria specified in subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code and any applicable written directives or regulations adopted by the department.(3) A prospective successor guardian shall not be required to be approved as a resource family pursuant to Section 16519.5 for the sole purpose of receiving Kin-GAP funding on behalf of an eligible child in the care of the prospective successor guardian.SECTION 1.SEC. 8. Section 11403 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:11403. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to exercise the option afforded states pursuant to Section 475(8) (42 U.S.C. Sec. 675(8)), and Section 473(a)(4) (42 U.S.C. Sec. 673(a)(4)) of the federal Social Security Act, as contained in the federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351), to receive federal financial participation for nonminor dependents of the juvenile court who satisfy the conditions of subdivision (b), consistent with their transitional independent living case plan. Nonminor dependents are eligible to receive support until they reach 21 years of age, consistent with their transitional independent living case plan and as described in Section 10103.5. It is the intent of the Legislature, both at the time of initial determination of the nonminor dependent’s eligibility and throughout the time the nonminor dependent is eligible for aid pursuant to this section, that the social worker or probation officer or Indian tribal placing entity and the nonminor dependent shall work together to ensure the nonminor dependent’s ongoing eligibility. All case planning shall be a collaborative effort between the nonminor dependent and the social worker, probation officer, or Indian tribe, with the nonminor dependent assuming increasing levels of responsibility and independence.(b) (1) A nonminor dependent receiving aid pursuant to this chapter, who satisfies the age criteria set forth in subdivision (a), shall meet the legal authority for placement and care by being under a foster care placement order by the juvenile court, or the voluntary reentry agreement as set forth in subdivision (z) of Section 11400, and is otherwise eligible for AFDC-FC payments pursuant to Section 11401. A nonminor who satisfies the age criteria set forth in subdivision (a), and who is otherwise eligible, shall continue to receive CalWORKs payments pursuant to Section 11253, Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program benefits pursuant to Section 11461.3, or, as a nonminor former dependent or ward, aid pursuant to Kin-GAP under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) or adoption assistance payments, as specified in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4. A nonminor former dependent child or ward of the juvenile court who is receiving AFDC-FC benefits pursuant to Section 11405 and who satisfies the criteria set forth in subdivision (a) is eligible to continue to receive aid as long as the nonminor is otherwise eligible for AFDC-FC benefits under this subdivision. This subdivision applies when one or more of the following conditions exist:(1)(A) The nonminor is completing secondary education or a program leading to an equivalent credential.(2)(B) The nonminor is enrolled in an institution that provides postsecondary or vocational education.(3)(C) The nonminor is participating in a program or activity designed to promote, or remove barriers to, employment.(4)(D) The nonminor is employed for at least 80 hours per month.(5)(E) The nonminor is incapable of doing any of the activities described in paragraphs (1) to (4), subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, due to a medical condition, and that incapability is supported by regularly updated information in the case plan of the nonminor. The requirement to update the case plan under this section does not apply to nonminor former dependents or wards in receipt of Kin-GAP program or Adoption Assistance Program payments.(2) A nonminor dependent shall not be denied eligibility for, or have eligibility terminated from, receipt of aid pursuant to this chapter and any other extended foster care benefits provided pursuant to the California Fostering Connections to Success Act (Chapter 559 of the Statutes of 2010) for failure to meet education or employment participation requirements that exceed the requirements described in paragraph (1). This subdivision applies to, but is not limited to, county welfare agencies, judicial officers, and licensed foster care providers.(c) The county child welfare or probation department, Indian tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization that has entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1, shall work together with a nonminor dependent who is in foster care on the nonminor dependent’s 18th birthday and thereafter or a nonminor former dependent receiving aid pursuant to Section 11405, to satisfy one or more of the conditions described in paragraphs (1) to (5), subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of subdivision (b) and shall certify the nonminor’s applicable condition or conditions in the nonminor’s six-month transitional independent living case plan update, and provide the certification to the eligibility worker and to the court at each six-month case plan review hearing for the nonminor dependent. Relative guardians who receive Kin-GAP payments and adoptive parents who receive adoption assistance payments shall be responsible for reporting to the county welfare agency that the nonminor does not satisfy at least one of the conditions described in subdivision (b). The social worker, probation officer, or tribal entity shall verify and obtain assurances that the nonminor dependent continues to satisfy at least one of the conditions in paragraphs (1) to (5), subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of subdivision (b) at each six-month transitional independent living case plan update. The six-month case plan update shall certify the nonminor’s eligibility pursuant to subdivision (b) for the next six-month period. During the six-month certification period, the payee and nonminor shall report any change in placement or other relevant changes in circumstances that may affect payment. The nonminor dependent, or nonminor former dependent receiving aid pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11405, shall be informed of all due process requirements, in accordance with state and federal law, prior to an involuntary termination of aid, and shall simultaneously be provided with a written explanation of how to exercise their due process rights and obtain referrals to legal assistance. Any notices of action regarding eligibility shall be sent to the nonminor dependent or former dependent, their counsel, as applicable, and the placing worker, in addition to any other payee. Payments of aid pursuant to Kin-GAP under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385), adoption assistance payments as specified in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4, or aid pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11405 that are made on behalf of a nonminor former dependent shall terminate subject to the terms of the agreements. Subject to federal approval of amendments to the state plan, aid payments may be suspended and resumed based on changes of circumstances that affect eligibility. Nonminor former dependents, as identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (aa) of Section 11400, are not eligible for reentry under subdivision (e) of Section 388 as nonminor dependents under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, but may be eligible for reentry pursuant to Section 388.1 if (1) the nonminor former dependent was receiving or, but for the receipt of Supplemental Security Income benefits or other aid from the federal Social Security Administration, would have received aid under either Kin-GAP pursuant to Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) or AFDC-FC pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11405, or the nonminor was receiving adoption assistance payments, as specified in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4, and (2) the nonminor’s former guardian or adoptive parent dies, or no longer provides ongoing support to, and no longer receives benefits on behalf of, the nonminor after the nonminor turns 18 years of age, but before the nonminor turns 21 years of age. Nonminor former dependents requesting the resumption of AFDC-FC payments pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11405 shall complete the applicable portions of the voluntary reentry agreement, as described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400.(d) A nonminor dependent may receive all of the payment directly provided that the nonminor is living independently in a supervised placement, as described in subdivision (w) of Section 11400, and that both the youth and the agency responsible for the foster care placement have signed a mutual agreement, as defined in subdivision (u) of Section 11400, if the youth is capable of making an informed agreement, that documents the continued need for supervised out-of-home placement, and the nonminor’s and social worker’s or probation officer’s agreement to work together to facilitate implementation of the mutually developed supervised placement agreement and transitional independent living case plan.(e) Eligibility for aid under this section shall not terminate until the nonminor dependent attains the age criteria, as set forth in subdivision (a), but aid may be suspended when the nonminor dependent no longer resides in an eligible facility, as described in Section 11402, or is otherwise not eligible for AFDC-FC benefits under Section 11401, or terminated at the request of the nonminor, or after a court terminates dependency jurisdiction pursuant to Section 391, delinquency jurisdiction pursuant to Section 607.2, or transition jurisdiction pursuant to Section 452. AFDC-FC benefits to nonminor dependents may be resumed at the request of the nonminor by completing a voluntary reentry agreement pursuant to subdivision (z) of Section 11400, before or after the filing of a petition filed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 after a court terminates dependency or transitional jurisdiction pursuant to Section 391 or delinquency jurisdiction pursuant to Section 607.2. The county welfare or probation department or Indian tribal entity that has entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 shall complete the voluntary reentry agreement with the nonminor who agrees to satisfy the criteria of the agreement, as described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400. The county welfare department or tribal entity shall establish a new child-only Title IV-E eligibility determination based on the nonminor’s completion of the voluntary reentry agreement pursuant to Section 11401. Pursuant to Section 11401 and subdivision (g), state AFDC-FC benefits are available if all other criteria are met, if the nonminor is determined ineligible for federal financial participation under subdivision (g) of Section 11401. The beginning date of aid for either federal or state AFDC-FC for a reentering nonminor who is placed in foster care is the date the voluntary reentry agreement is signed or the nonminor is placed, whichever is later. The county welfare department, county probation department, or tribal entity shall provide a nonminor dependent who wishes to continue receiving aid with the assistance necessary to meet and maintain eligibility.(f) A nonminor dependent shall not be denied eligibility for, or have eligibility terminated from, receipt of aid pursuant to this chapter and any other extended foster care benefits provided pursuant to the California Fostering Connections to Success Act (Chapter 559 of the Statutes of 2010) for failure to meet education or employment participation requirements that exceed the requirements described in subdivision (b). This subdivision applies to, but is not limited to, county welfare agencies, judicial officers, and licensed foster care providers.(g) (1) The county having jurisdiction of the nonminor dependent shall remain the county of payment under this section regardless of the youth’s physical residence. Nonminor former dependents receiving aid pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11405 shall be paid by their county of residence. Counties may develop courtesy supervision agreements to provide case management and independent living services by the county of residence pursuant to the nonminor dependent’s transitional independent living case plan. Placements made out of state are subject to the applicable requirements of the Interstate Compact on Placement of Children, pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 7900) of Division 12 of the Family Code.(2) The county welfare department, county probation department, or tribal entity shall notify all foster youth who attain 16 years of age and are under the jurisdiction of that county or tribe, including those receiving Kin-GAP, and AAP, of the existence of the aid prescribed by this section.(3) The department shall seek any waiver to amend its Title IV-E State Plan with the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services necessary to implement this section.(h) (1) Subject to paragraph (3), a county shall pay the nonfederal share of the cost of extending aid pursuant to this section to eligible nonminor dependents who have reached 18 years of age and who are under the jurisdiction of the county, including AFDC-FC payments pursuant to Section 11401, aid pursuant to Kin-GAP under Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385), adoption assistance payments as specified in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4, and aid pursuant to Section 11405 for nonminor dependents who are residing in the county as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). A county shall contribute to the CalWORKs payments pursuant to Section 11253 and aid pursuant to Kin-GAP under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) at the statutory sharing ratios in effect on January 1, 2012.(2) Subject to paragraph (3), a county shall pay the nonfederal share of the cost of providing permanent placement services pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 16508 and administering the Aid to Families with Dependent Children Foster Care program pursuant to Section 15204.9. For purposes of budgeting, the department shall use a standard for the permanent placement services that is equal to the midpoint between the budgeting standards for family maintenance services and family reunification services.(3) (A) (i) Notwithstanding any other law, a county’s required total contribution pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), excluding costs incurred pursuant to Section 10103.5, shall not exceed the amount of savings in Kin-GAP assistance grant expenditures realized by the county from the receipt of federal funds due to the implementation of Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385), and the amount of funding specifically included in the Protective Services Subaccount within the Support Services Account within the Local Revenue Fund 2011, plus any associated growth funding from the Support Services Growth Subaccount within the Sales and Use Tax Growth Account to pay the costs of extending aid pursuant to this section.(ii) A county, at its own discretion, may expend additional funds beyond the amounts identified in clause (i). These additional amounts shall not be included in any cost and savings calculations or comparisons performed pursuant to this section.(B) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code. In addition, the following are available to the counties for the purpose of funding costs pursuant to this section:(i) The savings in Kin-GAP assistance grant expenditures realized from the receipt of federal funds due to the implementation of Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385).(ii) The savings realized from the change in federal funding for adoption assistance resulting from the enactment of Public Law 110-351 and consistent with subdivision (d) of Section 16118.(4) (A) The limit on the county’s total contribution pursuant to paragraph (3) shall be assessed by the State Department of Social Services, in conjunction with the California State Association of Counties, in 2015–16, to determine if it shall be removed. The assessment of the need for the limit shall be based on a determination on a statewide basis of whether the actual county costs of providing extended care pursuant to this section, excluding costs incurred pursuant to Section 10103.5, are fully funded by the amount of savings in Kin-GAP assistance grant expenditures realized by the counties from the receipt of federal funds due to the implementation of Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) and the amount of funding specifically included in the Protective Services Subaccount within the Support Services Account within the Local Revenue Fund 2011 plus any associated growth funding from the Support Services Growth Subaccount within the Sales and Use Tax Growth Account to pay the costs of extending aid pursuant to this section.(B) If the assessment pursuant to subparagraph (A) shows that the statewide total costs of extending aid pursuant to this section, excluding costs incurred pursuant to Section 10103.5, are fully funded by the amount of savings in Kin-GAP assistance grant expenditures realized by the counties from the receipt of federal funds due to the implementation of Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) and the amount of funding specifically included in the Protective Services Subaccount within the Support Services Account within the Local Revenue Fund 2011 plus any associated growth funding from the Support Services Growth Subaccount within the Sales and Use Tax Growth Account to pay the costs of extending aid pursuant to this section, the Department of Finance shall certify that fact, in writing, and shall post the certification on its internet website, at which time subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) shall no longer be implemented.(i) It is the intent of the Legislature that a county currently participating in the Child Welfare Demonstration Capped Allocation Project not be adversely impacted by the department’s exercise of its option to extend foster care benefits pursuant to Section 673(a)(4) and Section 675(8) of Title 42 of the United States Code in the federal Social Security Act, as contained in the federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351). Therefore, the department shall negotiate with the United States Department of Health and Human Services on behalf of those counties that are currently participating in the demonstration project to ensure that those counties receive reimbursement for these new programs outside of the provisions of those counties’ waiver under Subtitle IV-E (commencing with Section 470) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.).(j) The department, on or before July 1, 2013, shall develop regulations to implement this section in consultation with concerned stakeholders, including, but not limited to, representatives of the Legislature, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, the Judicial Council, representatives of Indian tribes, the California Youth Connection, former foster youth, child advocacy organizations, labor organizations, juvenile justice advocacy organizations, foster caregiver organizations, and researchers. In the development of these regulations, the department shall consider its Manual of Policy and Procedures, Division 30, Chapter 30-912, 913, 916, and 917, as guidelines for developing regulations that are appropriate for young adults who can exercise incremental responsibility concurrently with their growth and development. The department, in its consultation with stakeholders, shall take into consideration the impact to the statewide child welfare information system and required modifications needed to accommodate eligibility determination under this section, benefit issuance, case management across counties, and recognition of the legal status of nonminor dependents as adults, as well as changes to data tracking and reporting requirements as required by the Child Welfare System Improvement and Accountability Act as specified in Section 10601.2, and federal outcome measures as required by the federal John H. Chafee Foster Care Independence Program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 677(f)). In addition, the department, in its consultation with stakeholders, shall define the supervised independent living setting, which shall include, but not be limited to, apartment living, room and board arrangements, college or university dormitories, and shared roommate settings, and define how those settings meet health and safety standards suitable for nonminors. The department, in its consultation with stakeholders, shall define the six-month certification of the conditions of eligibility pursuant to subdivision (b) to be consistent with the flexibility provided by federal policy guidance, to ensure that there are ample supports for a nonminor to achieve the goals of the nonminor’s transition independent living case plan. The department, in its consultation with stakeholders, shall ensure that notices of action and other forms created to inform the nonminor of due process rights and how to access them shall be developed, using language consistent with the special needs of the nonminor dependent population.(k) Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall prepare for implementation of the applicable provisions of this section by publishing, after consultation with the stakeholders listed in subdivision (j), all-county letters or similar instructions from the director by October 1, 2011, to be effective January 1, 2012. Emergency regulations to implement the applicable provisions of this act may be adopted by the director in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The initial adoption of the emergency regulations and one readoption of the emergency regulations are deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the first readoption of those emergency regulations are exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days.SEC. 9. Section 11405 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:11405. (a) Except for nonminors described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), AFDC-FC benefits shall be paid to an otherwise eligible child living with a nonrelated legal guardian, provided that the legal guardian cooperates with the county welfare department in all of the following:(1) Developing a written assessment of the child’s needs.(2) Updating the assessment no less frequently than once every six months.(3) Carrying out the case plan developed by the county.(b) Except for nonminors described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), when AFDC-FC is applied for on behalf of a child living with a nonrelated legal guardian the county welfare department shall do all of the following:(1) Develop a written assessment of the child’s needs.(2) Update those assessments no less frequently than once every six months.(3) Develop a case plan that specifies how the problems identified in the assessment are to be addressed.(4) Make visits to the child as often as appropriate, but in no event less often than once every six months.(c) Where the child is a parent and has a child living with them in the same eligible facility, the assessment required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall include the needs of their child.(d) Nonrelated legal guardians of eligible children who are in receipt of AFDC-FC payments described in this section shall be exempt from the requirement to register with the Statewide Registry of Private Professional Guardians pursuant to former Sections 2850 and 2851 of the Probate Code.(e) (1) On and after January 1, 2012, a nonminor youth whose nonrelated guardianship was ordered in juvenile court pursuant to Section 360 or 366.26, and whose dependency was dismissed, shall remain eligible for AFDC-FC benefits until the youth attains 19 years of age, effective January 1, 2013, until the youth attains 20 years of age, and effective January 1, 2014, until the youth attains 21 years of age, provided that the youth enters into a mutual agreement with the agency responsible for their guardianship, and the youth is meeting the conditions of eligibility, as described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.(2) A nonminor former dependent or ward, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (aa) of Section 11400, shall be eligible for benefits under this section until the youth attains 21 years of age if all of the following conditions are met:(A) The nonminor former dependent or ward attained 18 years of age while in receipt of Kin-GAP benefits pursuant to Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385).(B) The nonminor’s relationship to the kinship guardian is defined in paragraph (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 11391.(C) The nonminor was under 16 years of age at the time the Kin-GAP negotiated agreement payments commenced.(D) The guardian continues to be responsible for the support of the nonminor.(E) The nonminor otherwise is meeting the conditions of eligibility, as described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.(f) On or after January 1, 2012, a child whose nonrelated guardianship was ordered in probate court pursuant Article 2 (commencing with Section 1510) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Probate Code, who is attending high school or the equivalent level of vocational or technical training on a full-time basis, or who is in the process of pursuing a high school equivalency certificate before their 18th birthday may continue to receive aid following their 18th birthday as long as the child continues to reside in the guardian’s home, remains otherwise eligible for AFDC-FC benefits and continues to attend high school or the equivalent level of vocational or technical training on a full-time basis, or continues to pursue a high school equivalency certificate, and the child may reasonably be expected to complete the educational or training program or to receive a high school equivalency certificate, before their 19th birthday. Aid shall be provided to an individual pursuant to this section provided that both the individual and the agency responsible for the foster care placement have signed a mutual agreement, if the individual is capable of making an informed agreement, documenting the continued need for out-of-home placement.(g) (1) For cases in which a guardianship was established on or before June 30, 2011, or the date specified in a final order, for which the time for appeal has passed, issued by a court of competent jurisdiction in California State Foster Parent Association, et al. v. William Lightbourne, et al. (U.S. Dist. Ct. No. C 07-05086 WHA), whichever is earlier, the AFDC-FC payment described in this section shall be the foster family home rate structure in effect before the effective date specified in the order described in this paragraph.(2) For cases in which guardianship has been established on or after July 1, 2011, or the date specified in the order described in paragraph (1), whichever is earlier, and through December 31, 2016, the AFDC-FC payments described in this section shall be the basic foster family home rate structure effective and available as of December 31, 2016.(3) For cases in which guardianship has been established by the juvenile court on or after January 1, 2017, and before July 1, 2027, or the effective date specified in paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, the AFDC-FC payments described in this section shall not exceed the home-based family care rate structure developed pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 11461 and Section 11463.(4) (A) For cases in which guardianship has been established by the juvenile court on and after the date specified in paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, the rate paid shall not exceed Tier 1 of the Care and Supervision component of the Tiered Rate Structure, as described in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, unless the conditions of subparagraph (B) apply.(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the rate paid may exceed Tier 1, but shall not exceed Tier 2, of the Care and Supervision component of the Tiered Rate Structure, as described in subdivision (h) of Section 11461, under specific conditions established by the department and based on the assessed needs of the child.(5) For cases in which guardianship has been established in the probate court on or after January 1, 2017, the AFDC-FC payments described in this section shall not exceed the basic level rate of the home-based family care rate structure in effect on June 30, 2027.(6) Beginning with the 2011–12 fiscal year, the AFDC-FC payments identified in this subdivision shall be adjusted annually by the percentage change in the California Necessities Index rate as set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 11461.(h) In addition to the AFDC-FC rate paid, all of the following also shall be paid:(1) A specialized care increment, if applicable, as set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 11461.(2) A clothing allowance, as set forth in subdivision (f) of Section 11461.(3) For a child eligible for an AFDC-FC payment who is a teen parent, the rate shall include the two-hundred-dollar ($200) monthly payment made to the relative caregiver in a whole family foster home pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 11465.SEC. 10. Section 16120 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:16120. A child is eligible for Adoption Assistance Program benefits if all of the conditions specified in subdivisions (a) to (l), inclusive, are met or if the conditions specified in subdivision (m) are met.(a) (1) It has been determined that the child cannot or should not be returned to the home of the child’s parents as evidenced by any of the following:(A) A petition for termination of parental rights.(B) A court order terminating parental rights.(C) A signed relinquishment.(D) In the case of a tribal customary adoption, the court has given full faith and credit to a tribal customary adoption order as provided for pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 366.26.(E) In the case of a nonminor dependent, the court has dismissed dependency or transitional jurisdiction subsequent to the approval of the nonminor dependent adoption petition pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 366.31.(F) In the case of an Indian child who was a dependent of the juvenile court immediately prior to the transfer of the Indian child’s case pursuant to Section 305.5, a final order of adoption issued by the tribal court of the child’s tribe.(2) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific paragraph (1) by means of all-county letters, written directives, interim licensing standards, or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters, written directives, interim licensing standards, or similar written instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations.(b) The child has at least one of the following characteristics that are barriers to the child’s adoption:(1) Adoptive placement without financial assistance is unlikely because of membership in a sibling group that should remain intact or by virtue of race, ethnicity, color, language, three years of age or older, or parental background of a medical or behavioral nature that can be determined to adversely affect the development of the child.(2) Adoptive placement without financial assistance is unlikely because the child has a mental, physical, emotional, or medical disability that has been certified by a licensed professional competent to make an assessment and operating within the scope of that licensee’s profession. This paragraph shall also apply to children with a developmental disability, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 4512, including those determined to require out-of-home nonmedical care, as described in Section 11464.(c) The need for an adoption subsidy is evidenced by an unsuccessful search for an adoptive home to take the child without financial assistance, as documented in the case file of the prospective adoptive child. The requirement for this search shall be waived when it would be against the best interest of the child because of the existence of significant emotional ties with prospective adoptive parents while in the care of these persons as a foster child.(d) The child satisfies any of the following criteria:(1) The child is under 18 years of age.(2) The child is under 21 years of age and has a mental or physical handicap that warrants the continuation of assistance.(3) Effective January 1, 2012, the child is under 19 years of age, effective January 1, 2013, the child is under 20 years of age, and effective January 1, 2014, the child is under 21 years of age and as described in Section 10103.5, and has attained 16 years of age before the adoption assistance agreement became effective, and one or more of the conditions specified in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403 applies.(e) The adoptive family is responsible for the child pursuant to the terms of an adoptive placement agreement or a final decree of adoption and has signed an adoption assistance agreement.(f) The adoptive family is legally responsible for the support of the child and the child is receiving support from the adoptive parent.(g) The department or the county responsible for determining the child’s Adoption Assistance Program eligibility status and for providing financial aid, and the prospective adoptive parent, prior to or at the time the adoption decree is issued by the court, have signed an adoption assistance agreement that stipulates the need for, and the amount of, Adoption Assistance Program benefits.(h) The prospective adoptive parent or any adult living in the prospective adoptive home has completed the criminal background check requirements pursuant to Section 671(a)(20)(A) and (C) of Title 42 of the United States Code.(i) To be eligible for state funding, the child is the subject of an agency adoption, as defined in Section 8506 of the Family Code, and was any of the following:(1) Under the supervision of a county welfare department as the subject of a legal guardianship or juvenile court dependency.(2) Relinquished for adoption to a licensed California private or public adoption agency, or another public agency operating a Title IV-E program on behalf of the state, and would have otherwise been at risk of dependency as certified by the responsible public child welfare agency.(3) Committed to the care of the department pursuant to Section 8805 or 8918 of the Family Code.(4) The child is an Indian child and the subject of an order of adoption based on tribal customary adoption of an Indian child, as described in Section 366.24. Notwithstanding Section 8600.5 of the Family Code, for purposes of this subdivision a tribal customary adoption shall be considered an agency adoption.(j) To be eligible for federal funding, in the case of a child who is not an applicable child for the federal fiscal year, as defined in subdivision (n), the child satisfies any of the following criteria:(1) Prior to the finalization of an agency adoption, as defined in Section 8506 of the Family Code, or an independent adoption, as defined in Section 8524 of the Family Code, is filed, the child has met the requirements to receive federal supplemental security income benefits pursuant to Subchapter 16 (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, as determined and documented by the federal Social Security Administration.(2) The child was removed from the home of a specified relative and the child would have been AFDC eligible in the home of removal according to Section 606(a) or 607 of Title 42 of the United States Code, as those sections were in effect on July 16, 1996, in the month of the voluntary placement agreement or in the month court proceedings are initiated to remove the child, resulting in a judicial determination that continuation in the home would be contrary to the child’s welfare. The child must have been living with the specified relative from whom the child was removed within six months of the month the voluntary placement agreement was signed or the petition to remove was filed.(3) The child was voluntarily relinquished to a licensed public or private adoption agency, or another public agency operating a Title IV-E program on behalf of the state, and there is a petition to the court to remove the child from the home within six months of the time the child lived with a specified relative and a subsequent judicial determination that remaining in the home would be contrary to the child’s welfare.(4) Title IV-E foster care maintenance was paid on behalf of the child’s minor parent and covered the cost of the minor parent’s child while the child was in the foster family home or child care institution with the minor parent.(5) The child is an Indian child and the subject of an order of adoption based on tribal customary adoption of an Indian child, as described in Section 366.24.(k) To be eligible for federal funding, in the case of a child who is an applicable child for the federal fiscal year, as defined in subdivision (n), the child meets any of the following criteria:(1) At the time of initiation of adoptive proceedings, was in the care of a public or licensed private child placement agency or Indian tribal organization pursuant to either of the following:(A) An involuntary removal of the child from the home in accordance with a judicial determination to the effect that continuation in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child.(B) A voluntary placement agreement or a voluntary relinquishment.(2) The child meets all medical or disability requirements of Title XVI with respect to eligibility for supplemental security income benefits.(3) The child was residing in a foster family home or a child care institution with the child’s minor parent, and the child’s minor parent was in the foster family home or child care institution pursuant to either of the following:(A) An involuntary removal of the child from the home in accordance with a judicial determination to the effect that continuation in the home would be contrary to the welfare of the child.(B) A voluntary placement agreement or voluntary relinquishment.(4) The child is an Indian child and the subject of an order of adoption based on tribal customary adoption of an Indian child, as described in Section 366.24.(5) The nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, is the subject of an adoption pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 366.31.(l) (1) The child is a citizen of the United States or a qualified immigrant. If the child is a qualified immigrant who entered the United States on or after August 22, 1996, and is placed with an unqualified immigrant, the child must meet the five-year residency requirement pursuant to Section 673(a)(2)(B) of Title 42 of the United States Code, unless the child is a member of one of the excepted groups pursuant to Section 1612(b) of Title 8 of the United States Code.(2) For purposes of this subdivision, a “qualified immigrant” means a person who meets the definition of the term defined in Section 1641 of Title 8 of the United States Code.(m) A child or nonminor shall be eligible for Adoption Assistance Program benefits if the following conditions are met:(1) The child or nonminor received Adoption Assistance Program benefits with respect to a prior adoption and the child or nonminor is again available for adoption because the prior adoption was dissolved and the parental rights of the adoptive parents were terminated or because the child’s or nonminor’s adoptive parents died and the child or nonminor meets the special needs criteria described in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive. When a nonminor is receiving Adoption Assistance Program benefits after 18 years of age and the nonminor’s adoptive parents die, the juvenile court may resume dependency jurisdiction over the nonminor pursuant to Section 388.1.(2) To receive federal funding, the citizenship requirements in subdivision (l).(n) (1) Except as provided in this subdivision, “applicable child” means a child for whom an adoption assistance agreement is entered into under this section during any federal fiscal year described in this subdivision if the child attained the applicable age for that federal fiscal year before the end of that federal fiscal year.(A) For federal fiscal year 2010, the applicable age is 16 years.(B) For federal fiscal year 2011, the applicable age is 14 years.(C) For federal fiscal year 2012, the applicable age is 12 years.(D) For federal fiscal year 2013, the applicable age is 10 years.(E) For federal fiscal year 2014, the applicable age is eight years.(F) For federal fiscal year 2015, the applicable age is six years.(G) For federal fiscal year 2016, the applicable age is four years.(H) For federal fiscal year 2017, the applicable age is two years.(I) For October 1, 2017, to December 31, 2017, any age.(J) Effective January 1, 2018, to June 30, 2024, the applicable age is two years.(K) Effective July 1, 2024, and thereafter, any age.(2) Beginning with the 2010 federal fiscal year, the term “applicable child” shall include a child of any age on the date on which an adoption assistance agreement is entered into on behalf of the child under this section if the child meets both of the following criteria:(A) The child has been in foster care under the responsibility of the state for at least 60 consecutive months.(B) The child meets the requirements of subdivision (k).(3) Beginning with the 2010 federal fiscal year, an applicable child shall include a child of any age on the date that an adoption assistance agreement is entered into on behalf of the child under this section, without regard to whether the child is described in paragraph (2), if the child meets all of the following criteria:(A) The child is a sibling of a child who is an applicable child for the federal fiscal year, under subdivision (n) or paragraph (2).(B) The child is to be placed in the same adoption placement as an “applicable child” for the federal fiscal year who is their sibling.(C) The child meets the requirements of subdivision (k).SEC. 11. Section 16501.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:16501.1. (a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that the foundation and central unifying tool in child welfare services is the case plan.(2) The Legislature further finds and declares that a case plan ensures that the child receives protection and safe and proper care and case management, and that services are provided to the child and parents or other caretakers, as appropriate, in order to improve conditions in the parent’s home, to facilitate the safe return of the child to a safe home or the permanent placement of the child, and to address the needs of the child while in foster care.(3) The agency shall consider and document the recommendations of the child and family team, as defined in Section 16501, if any are available. The agency shall document the rationale for any inconsistencies between the case plan and the child and family team recommendations.(b) (1) A case plan shall be based upon the principles of this section, the Integrated Practice-Child and Adolescent Needs and Strengths (IP-CANS) assessment, and the input from the child and family team.(2) The case plan shall document that a preplacement assessment of the service needs of the child and family, and preplacement preventive services, have been provided, and that reasonable efforts to prevent out-of-home placement have been made. In the case of an Indian child, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 224.1, the case plan shall also document that the county agency made active efforts, as described in subdivision (f) of Section 224.1, to provide remedial services and rehabilitative programs designed to prevent the breakup of the Indian family. Preplacement services may include intensive mental health services in the home or a community setting and the reasonable efforts made to prevent out-of-home placement.(3) In determining the reasonable services to be offered or provided, the child’s health and safety shall be the paramount concerns.(4) Upon a determination pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 361.5 that reasonable services will be offered to a parent who is incarcerated in a county jail or state prison, detained by the United States Department of Homeland Security, or deported to their country of origin, the case plan shall include information, to the extent possible, about a parent’s incarceration in a county jail or the state prison, detention by the United States Department of Homeland Security, or deportation during the time that a minor child of that parent is involved in dependency care.(5) Reasonable services shall be offered or provided to make it possible for a child to return to a safe home environment, unless, pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (e) of Section 361.5, the court determines that reunification services shall not be provided. In the case of an Indian child, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 224.1, the agency shall make active efforts, as described in subdivision (f) of Section 224.1, to reunite an Indian child with their family.(6) If reasonable services are not ordered, or are terminated, reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanent plan and to complete all steps necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.(c) If out-of-home placement is used to attain case plan goals, the case plan shall consider the recommendations of the child and family team.(d) (1) The case plan shall include a description of the type of home or institution in which the child is to be placed, and the reasons for that placement decision. The decision regarding choice of placement shall be based upon selection of a safe setting that is the least restrictive family setting that promotes normal childhood experiences and the most appropriate setting that meets the child’s individual needs and is available, in proximity to the parent’s home, in proximity to the child’s school, and consistent with the selection of the environment best suited to meet the child’s special needs and best interests. The selection shall consider, in order of priority, placement with relatives, nonrelative extended family members, and tribal members; foster family homes, resource families, and approved or certified homes of foster family agencies; followed by intensive services for foster care homes; or multidimensional treatment foster care homes or therapeutic foster care homes; group care placements in the order of short-term residential therapeutic programs, group homes, community treatment facilities, and out-of-state residential treatment pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 7900) of Division 12 of the Family Code.(2) If a short-term residential therapeutic program placement is selected for a child or nonminor dependent, the case plan shall indicate the needs, including the needs as identified by the qualified individual pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 4096, of the child or nonminor dependent that necessitate this placement, the plan for transitioning the child or nonminor dependent to a less restrictive environment, and the projected timeline by which the child or nonminor dependent will be transitioned to a less restrictive environment, and the plan for aftercare services for at least six months postdischarge to a family-based setting, as required by Section 4096.6. The six months postdischarge requirement is inapplicable to the Medi-Cal component of the aftercare services, which shall be provided for the length of time the child needs specialty mental health services based on medical necessity criteria and other state and federal requirements. This section of the case plan shall be reviewed and updated at least semiannually.(A) The case plan for placements in a group home, or commencing January 1, 2017, in a short-term residential therapeutic program, shall indicate that the county has taken into consideration Section 16010.8.(B) (i) After January 1, 2017, a child and family team meeting as described in Section 16501 shall be convened by the county placing agency for the purpose of identifying the supports and services needed to achieve permanency and enable the child or youth to be placed in the least restrictive family setting that promotes normal childhood experiences.(ii) Child and family teams shall be provided written or electronic information developed by the department describing services and activities, including specialized permanency services, shown to be effective in achieving and sustaining permanency for all children, youth, and nonminor dependents.(C) On and after October 1, 2021, within 30 days of placement in a short-term residential therapeutic program, and, on and after July 1, 2022, within 30 days of placement in a community treatment facility, the case plan shall document all of the following:(i) The reasonable and good faith effort by the social worker to identify and include all required individuals in the child and family team.(ii) All contact information for members of the child and family team, as well as contact information for other relatives and nonrelative extended family members who are not part of the child and family team.(iii) Evidence that meetings of the child and family team, including the meetings related to the determination required under Section 4096, are held at a time and place convenient for the family.(iv) If reunification is the goal, evidence that the parent from whom the child was removed provided input on the members of the child and family team.(v) Evidence that the determination required under subdivision (g) of Section 4096 was conducted in conjunction with the child and family team.(vi) The placement preferences of the child or nonminor dependent and the child and family team relative to the determination and, if the placement preferences of the child or nonminor dependent or the child and family team are not the placement setting recommended by the qualified individual conducting the determination, the reasons why the preferences of the team or the child or nonminor dependent were not recommended.(D) Following the court review pursuant to Section 361.22, the case plan shall document the court’s approval or disapproval of the placement.(E) When the child or nonminor dependent has been placed in a short-term residential therapeutic program or a community treatment facility, as applicable, for more than 12 consecutive months or 18 nonconsecutive months, or, in the case of a child who has not attained 13 years of age, for more than 6 consecutive or nonconsecutive months, the case plan shall include both of the following:(i) Documentation of the information submitted to the court pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 366.1, subdivision (k) of Section 366.3, or paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 366.31, as applicable.(ii) Documentation that the deputy director or director of the county child welfare department has approved the continued placement of the child or nonminor dependent in the setting.(F) On and after October 1, 2021, prior to discharge from a short-term residential therapeutic program, and, on and after July 1, 2022, prior to discharge from a community treatment facility, the case plan shall include both of the following:(i) A description of the type of in-home or institution-based services to encourage the safety, stability, and appropriateness of the next placement, including the recommendations of the child and family team, if available.(ii) A plan, developed in collaboration with the short-term residential therapeutic program or community treatment facility, as applicable, for the provision of discharge planning and family-based aftercare support pursuant to Section 4096.6.(3) On or after January 1, 2012, for a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, who is receiving AFDC-FC benefits and who is up to 21 years of age pursuant to Section 11403, in addition to the above requirements, the selection of the placement, including a supervised independent living placement, as described in subdivision (w) of Section 11400, shall also be based upon the developmental needs of young adults by providing opportunities to have incremental responsibilities that prepare a nonminor dependent to transition to successful adulthood. If admission to, or continuation in, a group home or short-term residential therapeutic program placement is being considered for a nonminor dependent, the group home or short-term residential therapeutic program placement approval decision shall include a youth-driven, team-based case planning process, as defined by the department, in consultation with stakeholders. The case plan shall consider the full range of placement options, and shall specify why admission to, or continuation in, a group home or short-term residential therapeutic program placement is the best alternative available at the time to meet the special needs or well-being of the nonminor dependent, and how the placement will contribute to the nonminor dependent’s transition to successful adulthood. The case plan shall specify the treatment strategies that will be used to prepare the nonminor dependent for discharge to a less restrictive family setting that promotes normal childhood experiences, including a target date for discharge from the group home or short-term residential therapeutic program placement. The placement shall be reviewed and updated on a regular, periodic basis to ensure that continuation in the group home or short-term residential therapeutic program placement remains in the best interests of the nonminor dependent and that progress is being made in achieving case plan goals leading to successful adulthood. The group home or short-term residential therapeutic program placement planning process shall begin as soon as it becomes clear to the county welfare department or probation office that a foster child in group home or short-term residential therapeutic program placement is likely to remain in group home or short-term residential therapeutic program placement on their 18th birthday, in order to expedite the transition to a less restrictive family setting that promotes normal childhood experiences, if the child becomes a nonminor dependent. The case planning process shall include informing the youth of all of the options, including, but not limited to, admission to or continuation in a group home or short-term residential therapeutic program placement.(4) Consideration for continuation of existing group home placement for a nonminor dependent under 19 years of age may include the need to stay in the same placement in order to complete high school. After a nonminor dependent either completes high school or attains their 19th birthday, whichever is earlier, continuation in or admission to a group home placement is prohibited unless the nonminor dependent satisfies the conditions of paragraph (5) subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 11403, and group home placement functions as a short-term transition to the appropriate system of care. Treatment services provided by the group home placement to the nonminor dependent to alleviate or ameliorate the medical condition, as described in paragraph (5) subparagraph (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 11403, shall not constitute the sole basis to disqualify a nonminor dependent from the group home placement.(5) In addition to the requirements of paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, and taking into account other statutory considerations regarding placement, the selection of the most appropriate home that will meet the child’s special needs and best interests shall also promote educational stability by taking into consideration proximity to the child’s school of origin, and school attendance area, the number of school transfers the child has previously experienced, and the child’s school matriculation schedule, in addition to other indicators of educational stability that the Legislature hereby encourages the State Department of Social Services and the State Department of Education to develop.(e) A written case plan shall be completed within a maximum of 60 days of the initial removal of the child or of the in-person response required under subdivision (f) of Section 16501 if the child has not been removed from their home, or by the date of the dispositional hearing pursuant to Section 358, whichever occurs first. The case plan shall be updated, as the service needs of the child and family dictate. At a minimum, the case plan shall be updated in conjunction with each status review hearing conducted pursuant to Sections 364, 366, 366.3, and 366.31, and the hearing conducted pursuant to Section 366.26, but no less frequently than once every six months. Each updated case plan shall include a description of the services that have been provided to the child under the plan and an evaluation of the appropriateness and effectiveness of those services.(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that extending the maximum time available for preparing a written case plan from 30 to 60 days will afford caseworkers time to actively engage families, and to solicit and integrate into the case plan the input of the child and the child’s family, as well as the input of relatives and other interested parties.(2) The extension of the maximum time available for preparing a written case plan from 30 to 60 days shall be effective 90 days after the date that the department gives counties written notice that necessary changes have been made to the Child Welfare Services/Case Management System (CWS/CMS) to account for the 60-day timeframe for preparing a written case plan.(f) The child welfare services case plan shall be comprehensive enough to meet the juvenile court dependency proceedings requirements pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 300) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2.(g) The case plan shall be developed considering the recommendations of the child and family team, as follows:(1) The case plan shall be based upon an assessment of the circumstances that required child welfare services intervention. The child shall be involved in developing the case plan as age and developmentally appropriate.(2) The case plan shall identify specific goals and the appropriateness of the planned services in meeting those goals. In the case of an Indian child, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 224.1, the child’s tribe shall be included in the child and family team pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501 and shall be consulted in development of the case plan.(3) The case plan shall identify the original allegations of abuse or neglect, as defined in Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code, or the conditions cited as the basis for declaring the child a dependent of the court pursuant to Section 300, or all of these, and the other precipitating incidents that led to child welfare services intervention.(4) The case plan shall include a description of the schedule of the placement agency contacts with the child and the family or other caretakers. The frequency of these contacts shall be in accordance with regulations adopted by the State Department of Social Services. If the child has been placed in foster care out of state, the county social worker or probation officer, or a social worker or probation officer on the staff of the agency in the state in which the child has been placed, shall visit the child in a foster family home or the home of a relative, consistent with federal law and in accordance with the department’s approved state plan. If a child is placed in an out-of-state residential facility, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 7910 of the Family Code, pursuant to Section 361.21 or 727.1, visits shall be conducted at least monthly, pursuant to Section 16516.5. At least once every six months, at the time of a regularly scheduled placement agency contact with the foster child, and at each placement change, the child’s social worker or probation officer shall inform the child, the care provider, and the child and family team, if applicable, of the child’s rights as a foster child, as specified in Section 16001.9, and shall provide a written copy of the rights to the child as part of the explanation. The social worker or probation officer shall provide the information to the child in a manner appropriate to the age or developmental level of the child. The social worker or probation officer shall document in the case plan that they have informed the child of, and have provided the child with a written copy of, the child’s rights.(5) (A) When out-of-home services are used, the frequency of contact between the natural parents or legal guardians and the child shall be specified in the case plan. The frequency of those contacts shall reflect overall case goals, and consider other principles outlined in this section.(B) Information regarding any court-ordered visitation between the child and the natural parents or legal guardians, and the terms and conditions needed to facilitate the visits while protecting the safety of the child, shall be provided to the child’s out-of-home caregiver as soon as possible after the court order is made.(6) When out-of-home placement is made, the case plan shall include provisions for the development and maintenance of sibling relationships as specified in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 16002. If appropriate, when siblings who are dependents of the juvenile court are not placed together, the social worker for each child, if different, shall communicate with each of the other social workers and ensure that the child’s siblings are informed of significant life events that occur within their extended family. Unless it has been determined that it is inappropriate in a particular case to keep siblings informed of significant life events that occur within the extended family, the social worker shall determine the appropriate means and setting for disclosure of this information to the child commensurate with the child’s age and emotional well-being. These significant life events shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:(A) The death of an immediate relative.(B) The birth of a sibling.(C) Significant changes regarding a dependent child, unless the child objects to the sharing of the information with their siblings, including changes in placement, major medical or mental health diagnoses, treatments, or hospitalizations, arrests, and changes in the permanent plan.(7) If out-of-home placement is made in a foster family home, resource family home, group home, or other childcare institution that is either a substantial distance from the home of the child’s parent or out of state, the case plan shall specify the reasons why that placement is in the best interest of the child. When an out-of-state residential facility placement is recommended or made, the case plan shall, in addition, specify compliance with Section 16010.9 of this code and Section 7911.1 of the Family Code.(8) A case plan shall ensure the educational stability of the child while in foster care and shall include both of the following:(A) An assurance that the placement takes into account the appropriateness of the current educational setting and the proximity to the school in which the child is enrolled at the time of placement.(B) An assurance that the placement agency has coordinated with the person holding the right to make educational decisions for the child and appropriate local educational agencies to ensure that the child remains in the school in which the child is enrolled at the time of placement or, if remaining in that school is not in the best interests of the child, assurances by the placement agency and the local educational agency to provide immediate and appropriate enrollment in a new school and to provide all of the child’s educational records to the new school.(9) (A) If out-of-home services are used, or if parental rights have been terminated and the case plan is placement for adoption, the case plan shall include a recommendation regarding the appropriateness of unsupervised visitation between the child and any of the child’s siblings. This recommendation shall include a statement regarding the child’s and the siblings’ willingness to participate in unsupervised visitation. If the case plan includes a recommendation for unsupervised sibling visitation, the plan shall also note that information necessary to accomplish this visitation has been provided to the child or to the child’s siblings.(B) Information regarding the schedule and frequency of the visits between the child and siblings, as well as any court-ordered terms and conditions needed to facilitate the visits while protecting the safety of the child, shall be provided to the child’s out-of-home caregiver as soon as possible after the court order is made.(10) If out-of-home services are used and the goal is reunification, the case plan shall describe the services to be provided to assist in reunification and the services to be provided concurrently to achieve legal permanency if efforts to reunify fail. The plan shall also consider in-state and out-of-state placements, the importance of developing and maintaining sibling relationships pursuant to Section 16002, and the desire and willingness of the caregiver to provide legal permanency for the child if reunification is unsuccessful.(11) If out-of-home services are used, the child has been in care for at least 12 months, and the goal is not adoptive placement, the case plan shall include documentation of the compelling reason or reasons why termination of parental rights is not in the child’s best interest. A determination completed or updated within the past 12 months by the department when it is acting as an adoption agency or by a licensed adoption agency that it is unlikely that the child will be adopted, or that one of the conditions described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 366.26 applies, shall be deemed a compelling reason.(12) (A) Parents and legal guardians shall have an opportunity to review the case plan, and to sign it whenever possible, and then shall receive a copy of the plan. In a voluntary service or placement agreement, the parents or legal guardians shall be required to review and sign the case plan. Whenever possible, parents and legal guardians shall participate in the development of the case plan. Commencing January 1, 2012, for nonminor dependents, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, who are receiving AFDC-FC or CalWORKs assistance and who are up to 21 years of age pursuant to Section 11403, the transitional independent living case plan, as set forth in subdivision (y) of Section 11400, shall be developed with, and signed by, the nonminor.(B) Parents and legal guardians shall be advised that, pursuant to Section 1228.1 of the Evidence Code, neither their signature on the child welfare services case plan nor their acceptance of any services prescribed in the child welfare services case plan shall constitute an admission of guilt or be used as evidence against the parent or legal guardian in a court of law. However, they shall also be advised that the parent’s or guardian’s failure to cooperate, except for good cause, in the provision of services specified in the child welfare services case plan may be used in any hearing held pursuant to Section 366.21, 366.22, or 366.25 of this code as evidence.(13) (A) A child shall be given a meaningful opportunity to participate in the development of the case plan and state their preference for foster care placement. A child who is 12 years of age or older and in a permanent placement shall also be given the opportunity to review the case plan, sign the case plan, and receive a copy of the case plan.(B) For a child who receives a copy of the case plan pursuant to subparagraph (A) and who speaks a primary language other than English, the case plan shall be translated and provided to the child in their primary language.(14) The case plan shall be included in the court report, and shall be considered by the court at the initial hearing and each review hearing. Modifications to the case plan made during the period between review hearings need not be approved by the court if the casework supervisor for that case determines that the modifications further the goals of the plan. If out-of-home services are used with the goal of family reunification, the case plan shall consider and describe the application of subdivision (b) of Section 11203.(15) (A) If the case plan has as its goal for the child a permanent plan of adoption, legal guardianship, or another planned permanent living arrangement, it shall include a statement of the child’s wishes regarding their permanent placement plan and an assessment of those stated wishes. The agency shall also include documentation of the steps the agency is taking to find an adoptive family or other permanent living arrangements for the child; to place the child with an adoptive family, an appropriate and willing relative, or a legal guardian, and to finalize the adoption or legal guardianship. At a minimum, the documentation shall include child-specific recruitment efforts, such as the use of state, regional, and national adoption exchanges, including electronic exchange systems, when the child has been freed for adoption. Regardless of whether the child has been freed for adoption, documentation shall include a description of any barriers to achieving legal permanence and the steps the agency will take to address those barriers. If a child has been in care for three years or more, the documentation shall include a description of the specialized permanency services used or, if specialized permanency services have not been used, a statement explaining why the agency chose not to provide these services. If the plan is for kinship guardianship, the case plan shall document how the child meets the kinship guardianship eligibility requirements.(B) Specific elements of specialized permanency services may be included in the case plan as needed to meet the permanency needs of the individual child or nonminor dependent.(C) When the child is 16 years of age or older and is in another planned permanent living arrangement, the case plan shall identify the intensive and ongoing efforts to return the child to the home of the parent, place the child for adoption, place the child for tribal customary adoption in the case of an Indian child, establish a legal guardianship, or place the child nonminor dependent with a fit and willing relative, as appropriate. Efforts shall include the use of technology, including social media, to find biological family members of the child.(16) (A) (i) For a child who is 14 or 15 years of age, the case plan shall include a written description of the programs and services that will help the child, consistent with the child’s best interests, to prepare for the transition from foster care to successful adulthood. The description may be included in the document described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (18).(ii) When appropriate, for a child who is 16 years of age or older and, commencing January 1, 2012, for a nonminor dependent, the case plan shall include the transitional independent living plan (TILP), a written description of the programs and services that will help the child, consistent with the child’s best interests, to prepare for the transition from foster care to successful adulthood, and, in addition, whether the youth has an in-progress application pending for Title XVI Supplemental Security Income benefits or for special immigrant juvenile status or other applicable application for legal residency and an active dependency case is required for that application. For a child who speaks a primary language other than English, the TILP shall be translated into their primary language. When appropriate, for a nonminor dependent, the transitional independent living case plan, as described in subdivision (y) of Section 11400, shall include the TILP, a written description of the programs and services that will help the nonminor dependent, consistent with their best interests, to prepare for transition from foster care and assist the youth in meeting the eligibility criteria set forth in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) of Section 11403. If applicable, the case plan shall describe the individualized supervision provided in the supervised independent living placement as defined in subdivision (w) of Section 11400. The case plan shall be developed with the child or nonminor dependent and individuals identified as important to the child or nonminor dependent, and shall include steps the agency is taking to ensure that the child or nonminor dependent achieves permanence, including maintaining or obtaining permanent connections to caring and committed adults.(B) During the 90-day period prior to the participant attaining 18 years of age or older as the state may elect under Section 475(8)(B)(iii) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 675(8)(B)(iii)), whether during that period foster care maintenance payments are being made on the child’s behalf or the child is receiving benefits or services under Section 477 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 677), a caseworker or other appropriate agency staff or probation officer and other representatives of the participant, as appropriate, shall provide the youth or nonminor dependent with assistance and support in developing the written 90-day transition plan, that is personalized at the direction of the child, information as detailed as the participant elects that shall include, but not be limited to, options regarding housing, health insurance, education, local opportunities for mentors and continuing support services, and workforce supports and employment services, a power of attorney for health care, and information regarding the advance health care directive form. Information provided regarding health insurance options shall include verification that the eligible youth or nonminor dependent is enrolled in Medi-Cal and a description of the steps that have been or will be taken by the youth’s social worker or probation officer to ensure that the eligible youth or nonminor dependent is transitioned into the Medi-Cal program for former foster youth upon case closure with no interruption in coverage and with no new application being required, as provided in Section 14005.28.(C) For youth 14 years of age or older, the case plan shall include documentation that a consumer credit report was requested annually from each of the three major credit reporting agencies at no charge to the youth and that any results were provided to the youth. For nonminor dependents, the case plan shall include documentation that the county assisted the nonminor dependent in obtaining their reports. The case plan shall include documentation of barriers, if any, to obtaining the credit reports. If the consumer credit report reveals any accounts, the case plan shall detail how the county ensured the youth received assistance with interpreting the credit report and resolving any inaccuracies, including any referrals made for the assistance.(17) For youth 14 years of age or older and nonminor dependents, the case plan shall be developed in consultation with the youth. At the youth’s option, the consultation may include up to two members of the case planning team who are chosen by the youth and who are not foster parents of, or caseworkers for, the youth. The agency, at any time, may reject an individual selected by the youth to be a member of the case planning team if the agency has good cause to believe that the individual would not act in the youth’s best interest. One individual selected by the youth to be a member of the case planning team may be designated to be the youth’s adviser and advocate with respect to the application of the reasonable and prudent parent standard to the youth, as necessary.(18) For youth in foster care 14 years of age or older and nonminor dependents, the case plan shall include both of the following:(A) A document that describes the youth’s rights with respect to education, health, visitation, and court participation, the right to be annually provided with copies of their credit reports at no cost while in foster care pursuant to Section 10618.6, and the right to stay safe and avoid exploitation.(B) A signed acknowledgment by the youth that they have been provided a copy of the document and that the rights described in the document have been explained to the youth in an age-appropriate manner.(19) The case plan for a child or nonminor dependent who is, or who is at risk of becoming, the victim of commercial sexual exploitation, shall document the services provided to address that issue.(20) For a youth in foster care 10 years of age or older who is in junior high, middle, or high school, or a nonminor dependent enrolled in high school, the case plan shall be reviewed annually, and updated as needed, to indicate that the case management worker has verified that the youth or nonminor dependent received comprehensive sexual health education that meets the requirements established in Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 51930) of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code, through the school system. The case plan shall document either of the following:(A) For a youth in junior high or middle school, either that the youth has already received this instruction during junior high or middle school, or how the county will ensure that the youth receives the instruction at least once before completing junior high or middle school if the youth remains under the jurisdiction of the dependency court during this timeframe.(B) For a youth or nonminor dependent in high school, either that the youth or nonminor dependent already received this instruction during high school, or how the county will ensure that the youth or nonminor dependent receives the instruction at least once before completing high school if the youth or nonminor dependent remains under the jurisdiction of the dependency court during this timeframe.(21) (A) For a youth in foster care 10 years of age or older or a nonminor dependent, the case plan shall be updated annually to indicate that the case management worker has done all of the following:(i) Informed the youth or nonminor dependent that they may access age-appropriate, medically accurate information about reproductive and sexual health care, including, but not limited to, unplanned pregnancy prevention, abstinence, use of birth control, abortion, and the prevention and treatment of sexually transmitted infections.(ii) Informed the youth or nonminor dependent, in an age- and developmentally appropriate manner, of their right to consent to sexual and reproductive health care services and their confidentiality rights regarding those services.(iii) Informed the youth or nonminor dependent how to access reproductive and sexual health care services and facilitated access to that care, including by assisting with any identified barriers to care, as needed.(B) This paragraph shall not be construed to affect any applicable confidentiality law.(22) For a child who is 16 years of age or older and for a nonminor dependent, the case plan shall identify the person or persons, who may include the child’s high school counselor, Court-Appointed Special Advocate, guardian, or other adult, who shall be responsible for assisting the child or nonminor dependent with applications for postsecondary education and related financial aid, unless the child or nonminor dependent states that they do not want to pursue postsecondary education, including career or technical education. If, at any point in the future, the child or nonminor dependent expresses that they wish to pursue postsecondary education, the case plan shall be updated to identify an adult individual responsible for assisting the child or nonminor dependent with applications for postsecondary education and related financial aid.(23) On and after the date required by paragraph (9) of subdivision (h) of Section 11461, the case plan shall include all of the following:(A) The child’s or nonminor dependent’s tier, as determined by the IP-CANS assessment for purposes of the Tiered Rate Structure pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 11461.(B) If applicable, the plan to meet the child or nonminor dependent’s immediate needs, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 16562, using funding made available for that purpose.(C) The strengths building activities that the child or nonminor dependent is engaged in, or desires to be engaged in, as defined in Section 16565, for a child or nonminor dependent eligible for the Strengths Building Child and Family Determination Program established in Section 16565 and the spending plan report, as provided by the spending plan manager.(h) If the court finds, after considering the case plan, that unsupervised sibling visitation is appropriate and has been consented to, the court shall order that the child or the child’s siblings, the child’s current caregiver, and the child’s prospective adoptive parents, if applicable, be provided with information necessary to accomplish this visitation. This section does not require or prohibit the social worker’s facilitation, transportation, or supervision of visits between the child and their siblings.(i) The case plan documentation on sibling placements required under this section shall not require modification of existing case plan forms until the Child Welfare Services/Case Management System (CWS/CMS) is implemented on a statewide basis.(j) When a child is 10 years of age or older and has been in out-of-home placement for six months or longer, the case plan shall include an identification of individuals, other than the child’s siblings, who are important to the child and actions necessary to maintain the child’s relationships with those individuals, provided that those relationships are in the best interest of the child. The social worker or probation officer shall ask every child who is 10 years of age or older and who has been in out-of-home placement for six months or longer to identify individuals other than the child’s siblings who are important to the child, and may ask any other child to provide that information, or may seek that information from the child and family team, as appropriate. The social worker or probation officer shall make efforts to identify other individuals who are important to the child, consistent with the child’s best interests.(k) The child’s caregiver shall be provided a copy of a plan outlining the child’s needs and services. The nonminor dependent’s caregiver shall be provided with a copy of the nonminor’s TILP.(l) Each county shall ensure that the total number of visits made by caseworkers on a monthly basis to children in foster care during a federal fiscal year is not less than 95 percent of the total number of those visits that would occur if each child were visited once every month while in care and that the majority of the visits occur in the residence of the child. The county child welfare and probation departments shall comply with data reporting requirements that the department deems necessary to comply with the federal Child and Family Services Improvement Act of 2006 (Public Law 109-288) and the federal Child and Family Services Improvement and Innovation Act (Public Law 112-34).(m) The implementation and operation of the amendments to subdivision (i) enacted at the 2005–06 Regular Session shall be subject to appropriation through the budget process and by phase, as provided in Section 366.35.